However, during the search, everyone was arrested and sent to the Vesterborg camp.
Abai spent the night without sleep, but in the morning he took an hour's nap.
Although Abai felt good intentions from Dandibai, they did not help him then.
Although Ulbergen was poor, he kept his clothes clean.
Before repeating one word, tell me about my driving a combine.
Since you are talking about such advanced individual Komsomols, it would be better if you stood up for all the youth of the factory.
Young people are more educated, but they need the help of experienced workers.
Despite the fact that he turned 32 years old, this summer Captain Yenakiev got gray hair.
The sun is shining, but it's cold outside.
Although he was moving fast, he missed the train.
Although he had little time to study, he passed the exam well.
Marzhan came tired, so she didn't want to talk.
If you study, you will get a grade of five.
Until you bought earrings for five thousand tenge, give that money to your parents.
Although you came, the work was not over.
Although winter came, it did not snow.
Although spring has already begun, it is snowing.
Although Almas is educated, he has a bad memory.
Although it was cloudy, the rain was not.
It was cold on the street, so we dressed warmly.
Although the lesson began, the students were not fully gathered.
Although the day is cold, but the dormitory is warm.
Although I was tired, but the food was cooked.
Although they helped me, but I did everything myself.
Even though I went on vacation, I couldn't go anywhere.
Even though it will be cold tomorrow, will you go to the mountains?
Although he had money, he did not buy anything.
Although they had little time to prepare the lesson, they passed the exam well.
Although (despite the fact that) thick snow fell on Shymbulak, the winter season will open in November.
Despite the appeal of the Prosecutor General's Office, people in five cities rallied.
Although we both went to the same school, we are not close acquaintances.
Although I got a little cold, I'm fine.
Rather than wasting time, do your homework better.
It is better to have a bright face than a gold ring.
Than live a long time, and shine with silver, it is better to live a little, but sparkle with gold.
Although they have different goals, they have been working together for about ten years.
Although the moon is dark, it is quite possible to predict the path.
By the time I got there, he was gone.
If he doesn't write, I'll write to him.
He stayed at work until the evening, although he finished work.
If he doesn't go to the movies, I'll go myself.
The day in this valley is hot, but the nights are cold.
If the engine is not switched off, the impulse is suppressed.
Knowing that the store was closed, Rustem went there.
No matter how I looked, he did not notice me.
Before repeating myself, I rode a harvester.
Despite the fact that he was thirty-two years old, this summer Captain Yenakiev had gray hair on his forehead.
The more light, the better the plant will grow.
When Stepanov did not run, Igilik and Kenzhegara looked at each other.
Without the opening of these boarding schools, the problem of preparing Kazakhstani children for violinists and pianists at the conservatory would not have been solved.
Although it is difficult to study, there are many students who study very well.
Although they are related, they look like strangers.
Despite her father's permission, Gulnara did not let Baizhan go home.
Although Abai's father was cruel, his mother was kind.
Knowing that I am busy, you call for help.
He has been to our house before, but he could not find our house.
Get this tone even if it's expensive.
Even if there is no time, the phone rings.
Despite the arrival of winter, there was no snow.
There would be no snow if winter had not come.
You stay at home than freeze on the street.
The day was warm, so we went for a walk.
If the car doesn’t stop on the road, we’ll leave in exactly three hours.
People dress lightly, knowing that the sun is cold.
He wanted to refine the task, he dared not ask again.
If you're right, they'll understand the rest.
He couldn’t have gotten rid of the wolf if he hadn’t taken out his gun.
Although the work was long overdue, Rakhmet and Liza spent a lot of time analyzing tomorrow's meeting.
No matter how high the sea level is, water can come from anywhere in the region.
The day was warm, so we went for a walk.
After Kunanbai moved to Zhailau, others began to gather.
Unable to contain himself, he began to eat the cake again.
We went for a walk because it was warm.
Although he came, I could not leave.
He can do nothing but show off.
Although Baltabek recognized Amantai, Botakoz did not recognize
Although he did not promise, the next day he did not arrive at the promised place.
Although Darkhan got married, there was no wedding.
Although both hands were shaking, Ospan did not enter.
He can do nothing but show off.
Although the teacher entered the classroom, the students did not stand up.
Even if I don't go to school, I get bad grades.
It could not grow up, but it still has many branches.
Although we had a car, we could not get to the village.
When it was cold, the disciples climbed the mountain.
Although he is tall, he is paid less.
Although I was traveling to Almaty, I did not see him.
He didn't like what she said.
I told him, but he didn't decide.
Aizhan went to buy bread, but the store ran out of bread.
Although expensive, they ordered the full course.
Do you remember me, at least occasionally?
In any case, you shouldn't leave here.
Although the information was increased by ten percent, the facts were still false.
No matter how young he is, you cannot stop him from thinking for himself.
Even if I have to write a letter, I will not refuse it.
Despite the fact that it gets dark, planes fly overhead.
Although she is only twelve years old, she is a real lady.
Although she regularly goes to extra classes, she does not give up.
Although my sweater is not very pretty, it is very warm.
But he said he would not argue with me if he didn’t even agree with me.
Shortly before sunset, the fisherman went outside several times and looked at the sea from the top of a high cliff.
The singer, who played the dombra, occasionally sang and sang.
Zhupar and Kalampyr bowed their heads and chatted animatedly about something.
It was as if a white cloth floated in a cloud, and he experienced a special state.
Without a word, he sped off, mounted on his horse.
As if a sled without weight glides on glistening ice.
Without waiting for the return of the prematurely awakened sleep, the passengers hit the road again.
With trembling hands, Ospan entered the house.
Ospan left the house without telling me.
The song roamed the world spreading the glory of her people, and Rose returned to her country.
Stirring his jokes, laughter, they drank tea very merrily.
As if Dauren didn't have the strength to defend himself, he just hid.
Relatives take Tlek in the middle, kiss him in the face, shake his hand and congratulate him on his success.
Trembling with long eyelashes, Manar heard some noisy sounds
As if a sled without weight glides on glistening ice.
As if he had just fainted, Abish is showing no signs.
Having said good reviews about Nuri's work, they decided to put it on display.
I looked out the window for a long time, as if he would come.
Without leaning on a stick, he entered the house like a drunk.
He, not having rested, involuntarily resumed the interrupted work.
Amantai quickly got dressed and left the house and walked over to the bus.
Holding the book, Hakim listened to the words of Abdrahman without a whisper.
He fell asleep calmly, as if his work was being made easier.
Marat stepped forward, as if he recognized the street.
Asan was silent, holding his beloved hand.
They immediately got dressed and got on the bus.
Taking things from school, I come to the bus stop.
Amantai quickly ran out of the house and walked over to his car.
Askar brings books from the library and reads them at home.
He turned off the computer and went out to the cafeteria to meet with friends.
Azhar quickly did her homework and went to the store to choose clothes.
Magzhan finished reading the book at home and came for a walk with friends in the park.
Armand resumed his work, which was involuntarily interrupted.
He hurried into the house without telling anyone.
Ainur, without taking off her clothes, went to the kitchen.
Asem, without going into the store, began to talk on the phone.
Shynar, not looking around, sat down in an empty seat.
Tilek turned on the radio without driving.
Madina, not remembering the rules, continued to answer the questions in the test.
Bekbolat bought clothes without trying them on.
Dinara, despite the resistance of her mother, left the house with her friends.
Talgat took the bag in his hands and went to the exit from the house.
The children visited the park and took part in a festive event held on the occasion of the City Day.
Aigerim tidied up the room and found the earring Asem was looking for.
Asan watched many films in English and became interested in English.
Mother dressed Malik and sent him to school.
Nurzhan explained his situation to the teacher and received permission to do his homework at a different time.
Moses and Aisha admired the nature of the village and sang songs.
He bought his car and went to pick a new one.
I am confident that I will work hard and achieve my goal.
Two eyes are bleeding, and the body falls with anger on Bulyga.
Myra came in in a shiny shirt and smiled haughtily.
They joked, laughed, drank tea very merrily.
The spacious room seemed empty, and the mental nest was deserted.
Manetsky stirred, as if glad that everything was in order.
Holding the book, Hakim listened to the words of Abdrahman without a whisper.
He read Magzhan's poems day and night.
Despite day and night, Magzhan studied the history of the Kazakh people.
Azat entered as if his hands were trembling.
His body shook and Murat went inside.
Without shaking his body, Murat went inside.
Murat went inside in shock.
Murat went inside, as if his body was trembling.
Unknown equestrian art, no horse racing.
Anara was lying on the ground, as if she had just fallen off.
As if she had just fallen off, Anara was lying on the ground.
A newly thrown state, Anara was lying on the ground.
Having just broken off, Anara was lying on the ground.
From the word of mossiness, a warm feeling seemed to fill in Zhakypbek's heart, and he jumped off the spot.
The boy, with a pale oval face, in a tense state, involuntarily returned to the interrupted work.
The boy, with a brown oval face, with strained growth, involuntarily returned to the interrupted work.
The boy, without stopping, involuntarily took up the interrupted work.
The boy turned pale and involuntarily returned to the interrupted work.
Kuderi's words touched Zhakypbek's heart, and he stood up.
From the words of Zhakypbek, Kuderi's heart began to beat, and he stood up.
Jakypbek's words made Kuderi's heart flutter, and he stood up.
Asan did not talk to his friends and got into the car.
Asan did not talk to his friends and got into the car.
Asan disobeyed his friends and got into his car.
Gathering his things, Berik went out into the street.
Gathering his belongings, Berik went out into the street.
Without packing, Berik went out into the street.
Gathering his belongings, Berik went out into the street.
While they were getting ready, Berik went out into the street.
As soon as Amanbek memorized the poems, he went to tell the teacher.
Amanbek did not remember the poems and went to tell the teacher.
Amanbek learned poetry and went to tell the teacher.
Amanbek seemed to have memorized the verses and went to tell the teacher.
Despite the drought, the snake died this year as well.
Despite the drought, the snake died this year as well.
Bekzat, as if wishing to complete the task, asked the teacher again.
Bekzat, wanting to consolidate the task, asked the teacher again.
Bekzat, having received the assignment, asked the teacher again.
The siblings take turns kissing her on the cheek, squeezing her hand, and congratulating her on her success.
Brothers and sisters took turns kissing him on the cheek.
Brothers and sisters took turns kissing him on the cheek.
The siblings took turns kissing him on the cheek as if they had a wish.
As if the desire had escaped from the hands, congratulating on the success.
Without looking up from the hands of desire, congratulates on success.
With wishes, they take turns kissing, congratulating on success.
Children did different things to get rid of Ergesh's bad habits.
To listen to Ayana's fairy tale, village children gather every evening at the house of Bapai's grandfather.
He covered his face with a towel so that his comrades would not recognize him.
He wrapped felt around the horse's hooves so that the hooves could not be heard.
Not wanting to interfere with the happy moments of mother and child, he tried not to hear the whispers of his behavior.
To have a good life, you need to work hard.
Students want to know what they don't know.
Marat left for the city to study.
He traveled to many cities to study.
We turned to the edge of the village so that we could not hear the rumble of the horse.
He traveled to countries to study.
Stay home until I come.
He entered alone in order to take the thing he needed from there.
To keep your teapot without breaking, you need a good shelf.
Abai invited Magash and Abish to talk here alone.
The Balapan TV channel was opened for children to watch programs, films and cartoons in the Kazakh language.
He warmed his knees in front of the fire so that his leg stopped hurting.
Seeing my tears, Pavel went into the dining room so as not to upset me.
I will tell you that I sincerely wish, without hiding everything that is on my mind.
Чтобы отвлечься  от разных мыслей, закачавших мозг, Асия смотрела на горящий огонь. 
After this conversation, Ospan was going to go to work, taking Aigerim and Erbol, they left the house.
To keep the tea hot and thick, a jug with a side strip boils on the electric stove next to it.
The beetle digs a hole deep to prevent the penetration of winter cold.
He covered his face so that he would not be recognized.
To look the part, whoever saw, he kept himself calm.
The rest of the people passed by without making a sound, so as not to frighten the bird.
Bauzhan, wanting to see his mother, went to the village.
Azamat ran out onto the road to help his grandmother cross the road.
Asan extended his hand, wanting to say hello.
To forget who is near, he becomes with himself.
Nurzhan hid the broken bike in the direction of the barn so that no one could see it.
To be fluent in English, you need to watch a lot of films in that language.
He went in alone to get what he needed.
Kopey put a samovar in front of the door to see if the dust settled.
Earlier, Abai, through a translator he knew, greeted the newcomer Lozovsky, trying to figure out what he was doing.
Asan got up to answer the question.
Asem memorized a song for the New Year in order to receive a New Year's gift.
Aibek started learning a programming language, intending to release a new game playable on a computer.
Mairam and Asia spent the night doing their homework to get a good math grade.
Nargiza did not take out her umbrella to see if the rain would stop.
Wanting to find out about the condition of his grandmother, Marat went to the village.
The girls enrolled in a school circle to learn how to dance.
The girls wanted to learn to dance and enrolled in a school circle.
Rustam got up to make way for an adult on the bus.
Rustam got up to make way for an adult on the bus.
The old man walked to the back of the bus to see if the young people would give him a place.
Azat was silent, so as not to say anything offensive.
To entertain his friends, Meirbeck told interesting stories that he went through.
Asan called a taxi to take his mother to the clinic.
Darkhan worried that Saul would miss the train.
Aizhan was sitting on a bench in the yard, waiting for her friends.
Kasym wanted to learn how to drive and went out of town to drive.
You have to work hard to reach your goal.
On his birthday, Asan was waiting for his father in the yard to see if he would bring a new bicycle.
Asan's father came to the store for a birthday present.
Asan's father came to the store for a birthday present.
The mother took the children outside to clean the house.
The mother took the children outside to clean the house.
The children went home to see if their mother was cleaning the house.
Miras has published numerous reports on the development of thinking skills.
Miras did many tasks to develop his thinking skills.
Miras tried to solve difficult problems to see if his thinking skills would improve.
To please his mother, Bolat bought a towel as a present.
Bolat wanted to please his mother and bought a towel as a gift.
Bolat bought a towel as a gift to see if his mother would be happy.
Berzhan tried to advise his brother and called him.
Berzhan called his brother for advice.
Berzhan called his brother for advice.
Ainur and Feruza decided to make a surprise for Aliya.
Ainur and Feruza made a plan to surprise Aliya.
Alia wondered if Ainur and Feruz would be surprised.
Students began to raise additional funds for travel to other countries.
Students began to raise additional funds for travel to other countries.
Students began raising funds to see if they could visit other countries.
Asan leaves for this country for a long time to learn a new language.
Asan is going to live in the village for a long time to learn a new language.
Wanting to learn a new language, Asan decided to stay in the village for a long time.
Wanting to master a new direction, Gulnara began to prepare for the university.
To master a new direction, Gulnara began to prepare for the university.
Wanting to master a new direction, Gulnara began to prepare for the university.
Marzhan and Aybanu went to the cinema to watch the new film.
Marzhan and Aybanu went to the cinema to watch the new film.
The grandmother put the candies in a box to pass on to her grandson.
To give sweets to her granddaughter later, my grandmother put them in a box.
The grandmother put the candies in a box to pass them on to her grandson.
Rysgul wanted to go to study in another city and asked her mother's permission.
Rysgul asked her mother for permission to go to study in another city.
Rysgul asked her mother for permission to go to study in another city.
Madina bought the necessary products to learn how to bake cakes.
Madina wanted to learn how to bake cakes and bought the necessary food.
Madina bought the necessary products to learn how to bake cakes.
Relatives congratulated Tlek on his success.
Relatives congratulated Tlek on his success.
Relatives took Tlek to congratulate him on his success.
Kuanysh and Anara also waited for a personal conversation while those who were sitting would go out into the street.
Kuanysh and Anara also talked in private and waited for those sitting to go out into the street.
Kuanysh and Anara also talked in private, waiting for those sitting to go out into the street.
I decided to do physical labor and went on a summer vacation.
I went on a summer vacation to do manual labor.
I decided to do physical labor, went on summer vacation.
By the time the meeting was over, the list had already been drawn up.
Once, when Kurmash was feeding Kokserek, the black and piebald dog rushed to Kokserek.
The puppy, having arrived in the village, opened his eyes two days later.
When it got dark, Kokserek came to the village alone.
Leaving for summer vacations, he is engaged only in physical labor.
When Ulpan arrives at the promised place, there are traces of a horse, but the boy and the horse were not there.
With the onset of winter, Oraz also prepares to go hunting.
When they both left the house in the evening, the guests had not yet dispersed.
When the sun rose, Amankelde met about ten more people.
Since the people arrived, Kasym has not stayed in this house.
When Elkin came to the workshop in the afternoon, Zhakypa was not with the guys.
Today, when the black wind started, snow from the gravel also began to fall.
Before I could say this, he wrote it down.
Before leaving, Marat disposed of his documents.
When those who were sitting went out into the street, Kuanysh pen Anar also went for a separate walk.
After moving to the district center, the life of the population was significantly improved.
After moving from the winter quarters to Zhailau, the aul-aul begins to be invited to visit in honor of the neighborhood.
When they reached the finish line, Nurlan fell halfway down.
You weren't home when I came.
When Moldir went to the store, her mother was at work.
We were still at home when Sabir was outside.
When I got to the city, the weather deteriorated sharply and it began to rain heavily.
When the two of them left the house, the guests had not yet left.
When the February Revolution ended, the Alashorda party was created.
After the establishment of the government, Alash was sure that everything would be resolved fairly.
Before the formation of the party, patriotic citizens shared a common consciousness and ideas.
As soon as the work of the Alash arys began,many difficulties appeared.
When Abai entered the house, Abish read the paper in the envelope.
When Yeseli went out into the field, it was morning.
When the horses looked at each other, they saw a large crowd sitting nearby.
About a hundred years have passed since the discovery of Karaganda coal.
The village has not rested a day since the arrival in the village.
When the family went out into the street, white morning came.
When Timur returned home, his uncle invited him.
After sitting for a while, Asan, tired from walking during the day, fell asleep.
When he arrived, the lesson was over.
Before I asked Zenep about her sister, I myself found the place where her sister was sitting.
The barlastas arrived, Kulanbai went home.
Today, as soon as the strong wind began to blow, the snow began to fall.
After the death of Seyid's father,Igilik took the orphan to himself.
As soon as the sun rose, the village children gathered around Ayan.
When Birzhan arrived in the village, he was not separated from Abai.
When the smell of wormwood reaches our noses, we always remember Ayan.
When Abai set off, all his thoughts were about getting to the village faster.
Before the children turned to look back at the village, they saw a lot of people coming down to the plain.
When Asan went to school, his mother was at the store.
While Sabir was at school, we were still at home.
When Ainur arrived at the university, the friends had already reached home.
When Feruza called her mother, her brother was playing at home.
When they entered the house, the mother prepared the food at home.
After reading the book, Birzhan wanted to be like the main character of the book.
Asan remembers her grandmother when the smell of cake is in the kitchen.
As soon as a strong wind began to blow in the steppe, the leaves on the tree began to fall.
When Marat came to school, classes were already over.
When Abai enters the house,the village children discuss Abai's interesting story.
When I got to the library, it was raining hard.
When I put the books on the shelf, the shelf is about to fall.
When Miras went outside, the sun had already entered the nest.
When they got home, Nurzhan started talking on the phone and stayed halfway there.
Before I asked Aigerim to solve the problem, I found the answer myself.
You weren't at the museum when I arrived.
As soon as Kasym arrived, Asan's voice was not heard at all.
When Asan and Usen left the house, the guests had not yet left.
When they left the school, their classmates were still standing in front of the school.
When Mereke came out of the English class, her mother was waiting outside.
As soon as Kaisar learned to drive, he bought a new car.
As soon as I learned how to bake sweets, I made sweets on the table and invited my friends.
As heavy rain began to fall outside, children playing in the fields broke into their homes.
Before I asked Asem for a stop, I found it on the map in my phone.
When my phone went dead, I was already home.
With the onset of winter, people prepared for the hunt.
With the onset of autumn, people began to gather fruits.
Before the beginning of the summer, people began to prepare gardens.
After the exam, Marat did not start training.
When her mother came home, began to come to visit.
When Marat left to study in another city, his brother returned from school.
When they got out of school, their classmates still stood in front of the school.
When Asan came to work, his mother called.
Before them, as Asan came to work, called his mother.
When Asan came to work, his mother called.
When Arman came home, his mother cooked at home.
Before Arman returned home, he saw that his mother was washing linen in the field.
As only Asset did the lessons, he went out into the street to help his father.
As only the village children conspired, they were included in the game.
After that, as the village children told the story, they joined the game.
While the children were talking, Abai appeared in the distance.
While the children were talking, Abai appeared in the distance.
When the villagers were silent, Abai appeared in the distance.
When Ainura finished reading the book, a sound came from the window.
While Ainura was reading, a sound came from the window.
While the meeting did not begin, Aida entered the office.
As soon as the meeting began, Aida entered the office.
Once, the puppy was fed Kurmasha, the spotted puppy was thrown to the puppy.
In one beautiful day, while Kurmash was feeding his puppy, a black boy was feeding his puppy.
After the summer holidays he went to rest in Alma-Ata.
When Ulpa came to the promised place, there was no one.
By that time, as Ulpa had reached the promised place, everything had gone from house to house.
Wrestlers prepared for competitions before the performances of amateurs.
By that time, as boys and girls had built altybakan, March skin was already ready.
After the beginning of the Nauryz holiday, trees were planted.
When the earth began to blush, Kunanbay returned to the dacha from Karkaralinsk.
While my grandmother was reading a book, Abai went out into the street.
While Magzhan was looking for the village children, he saw Abisha in the distance.
By that time, as Asan came to the park, the children parted.
When I arrived in the village, the weather was bad.
Before I got to the village, it was snowing.
When I arrived in the village, the weather was bad.
Before Zhanar approached the school, Erbol appeared in front of her, smiling.
Nurkent attended additional classes, so far it was not possible to speak English fluently.
When Esen turned on the TV, the family's voice was not heard.
When Asan went out on the street, guests came to the house.
When Myra went for a walk in the village, her younger sister went for a walk.
When girls and guys created altybakan, March skin was ready.
While girls and boys did not create altybakan, March skin was ready.
After that, as girls and guys created altybakan, March skin was ready.
While my grandmother did not read the book, Abai went out into the street.
Then, as my grandmother read the book, Abai went out into the street.
When Arman entered the house, it turned out that his mother was cooking at home.
When they called at the door, in Aigerim's room flowers were flowing.
After Esen went to a new school, he made new friends.
Until then, as Esen went to a new school, his success was good.
Anara waited until Madi understood with her papers.
Unraveling Madi's paper, they went for a walk with Anara.
Madi, assembling clothes, went out into the street.
Azat continued to drive his brother's car until he bought a new car.
Marat finished his work to meet with Azat.
Marat finished his work, while Azat did not meet.
Zere, meeting Abay, feels very happy.
When Asan and Usen went fishing, Marat went to bring the ball, which remained at school.
Until then, the doctor did not prescribe the necessary treatment to the grandfather, the house came his son.
While Usen and his mother did not get to the market, Asan followed them.
While Usen and his mother did not get to the market, Asan followed them.
When Rysgul arrived at the airport, it was morning.
When Rysgul arrived at the airport, it was morning.
Just as Rysgul flew to the airport, she called her mother.
When Aigerim realized that Rysgul wanted to say, she had tears in her eyes.
Seeing the dispute between Bekezhan and Tolegen, Zhibek called on the villagers to help.
Seeing the dispute between Bekezhan and Tolegen, Zhibek called on the villagers to help.
Seeing the dispute between Bekezhan and Tolegen, Zhibek called on the villagers to help.
When mom and child came to the kindergarten, Marat played.
While mom and son got up to kindergarten, Marat ran ahead.
The cat, coming to the village, opened his eyes for two days.
When the puppy came to the village, his eyes did not open.
When Nurzhan came to the library, Asiya chose the book.
Before I got to the park, I had a lot on my mind.
When Aset came to school, the class had already ended.
By that time, as Anar came to school, the lessons were over.
When Ulan did not sleep at night, his family was excited.
When the mother brought the cake, the children ran away to meet her.
While my mother was preparing a pie, the children ran around their mother.
It must not be the only way to tear the eye out, for the snake with its eyes will tear itself apart and eventually die.
As a rule, the most virtuous person should start the harvest, so many people wanted to show this gift to Syrbay. 
Fearing that the Bata would be carried away by the current, Syrbay released the strap of his shoelace: he thought that if he pulled his head, he would put water in his ears. 
In the morning, neither a gazelle nor a saigas met the Hunter.
My hands are shaking, I'm afraid. 
It was as if he had finally found it: the lower eyelid of his right eye was beginning to crumble.
The task of starting work was entrusted to Fingerakov, because he knows Kazakh and Russian well.
No one invited you, so you don't go.
Rice seeds are sown by hand in water, the past cannot go to the water in which the seeds are sown.
This is the first time in my life that I have been able to grow a crop, and my soul would have been more painful than any other.
My soul would have been sicker than any other; it was the grain of the harvest that I had sown. 
The lakes of zhailau can not be trusted, in the year of drought many of them were drawn.
We went to the village on foot: the narrow road, which the car could not walk, left us no choice.
This bee does not need to swallow in winter, because there is a meadow growing around the lake.
The public was so engrossed in this conversation for a long time that no one was silent.
The Marmot's horse was dug, because it was a coal that was burning on its back.
I hate people who sell their friends, because they can also sell their homeland.
At the meeting, you speak first, so gather your thoughts.
The idea that Kalen would be brought to justice did not occur to him, because he understood that only Nurim and I were responsible.
Yerzhan asked me to cut off my pen, so I had to write down what I heard with a pencil.
This peasant was handed over to Kerim, because he is well aware of the state of the land. 
I felt sorry for him, and I also had tears in my eyes. 
The listener, the snaker, the builder of my songs are the people, so all that we collect belongs to the people. 
"I'm sorry," I said, " but I don't know what you're talking about."
The horse's bones were broken, so the whip was not thrown.
Today it is impossible to walk on the road, because the road is covered with snow.
I am not afraid of the difficulties of the work, because my father taught me the hard work.
I have a good year of study, and how do I know what is good and what is bad?
He was the youngest child, and he was very cowardly, too cowardly.
The excuse of the camel is insignificant, so both I and myself were convinced that he was eating a stick.
Yerzhan would have left if it hadn't been for the train.
Amir did not notice his excitement, because he was surprised that all the summer he spent in Abdrakhman's soul had changed beyond recognition.
At that time, his uncle was engaged only in making clothes, because he was "godless" in the country.
My father briefly told Zhumabay who I was, so he spoke to me without hesitation.
He had a great reputation for great work, so all the workers under his supervision saw what he said, the law,
He had seen Humpty Dumpty in a dream the night before, so the same suspicion had not escaped him.
The old man did not know what he was thinking, so he did not look at the two of them.
On the way, the horses of the Sega, led by Nurysh and Baky, were also on the road, so these four, who were just running away from the hunter like a wolf, were going to cross the Black Road from a distance.
Who does not take the language of zamadas, so I was going to accompany him.
In the course of these few days, Shaker became a person of his own, so he was delighted with his masculine words.
We should thank them, they reminded us.
His mother gave him two or three more baursaks, while the others stared at him with narrowed eyes. 
He didn't know what to do, but he thought he might have fallen.
Shalabai can not walk for a long time, the government has a long tail.
I'm not afraid, my grandmother asked me yesterday.
Most of them are light in their clothes, they can't go to work on distant farms, and the long spring does not feel comfortable for us.
I am not a man who is mature in the science of physics, so I have little understanding of the concepts given by engineers.
The goal is one, so dividing it into two is a compromise.
Now the problem is to increase the number of houses, because ten thousand hectares of land cannot be developed by sixty households.
"I don't know," he said. 
When he didn't move, he moved forward again. 
Since the guests left their horses at a distant post,they themselves come to the Horde on foot. 
Since taimas took Amanda out to the street alone, the friends stayed there, drinking kumiss. 
On the snow-covered ground, two men rode their horses, and oppa led his horses through the snow. 
Because of the thick middle of winter, Abay was at the end of the book in his new winter quarters in Akshok. 
The most difficult part of the work was here, and Yermek came here on purpose.
Since the village is located in this bug, he has not rested for a day.
From the news that came to the House of good, everything went through Ushakov and this Buluev, and these two were one of the long-standing associates of Umar.
Since all the zhailau is on the plain, it seems that the fire is often burning near the village.
This loss, which does not have a known dimension, is obviously a feed that is obtained in a dark way, because it is called "black loss" by the people.
In addition to the fact that many people were crying about Ospan, Abay himself sang poems in the language of the poet.
Due to heavy spring rains, residents of the House could not go outside. 
It was not the fault of the noble nation, but of a man who expressed his righteous anger against the violence that had taken place across the country.
Dauren did not have the strength to defend himself, but only bowed.
This meeting began during the labor month, and Abay later tied the knot in his own way.
Three widows, two of the three amens, were tied to it, and the others did not break the juice.
By the time I started my studies, I had about two or three months of free time, and in the same year I entered the agricultural census service, which was in general Russia. 
It is the first time I have ever heard of such a thing, and it is the first time I have ever heard of such a thing. 
Since school was close, I would have gone early in the morning. Since his article was not ready, it did not allow him to defend his research work. 
He took care of the chicks, and he kept them in the barn along the stream. 
It is worth noting that the books were placed in the chest, because of their special reverence. 
She cried for a long time, without stopping, because she could not bring herself to cry.
He was disappointed when he realized that the rope had slipped out of his hands. 
By day and night, as kolkhoz worked hard, Makpal did not feel how he got involved in the scale of life. 
Since you are an experienced driver in this village, I want to hold the reins of my car for you. 
His thoughts were still on the surface, but the image was still deep in the water.  
Sadyk was used to talking to himself, because he forgot that a person was sitting next to him on the road.
His mother, being the mainstay of shanyrak, supports him with all her soul. 
As a writer, Yelemes read these two books.
Kasym will continue to feed the sheep with a grid of Shaban, so I will get along with Yelem faster than Kasym.
This light was not so interesting for this world, because there was no meaning left.
After a while, the old man regained consciousness, because he did not know where he was going. 
It was cold, because the night was cold.
He felt relieved because he was lying on the sacred ground.
Sadiq had felt the invisible barrier several times before, so he held it tight.
He was awakened by a muffled voice, for he did not know how long he had slept.
This time, the State Farm was not happy, so the director of the State Farm was reprimanded.
He thought he was going to start talking to himself, so he looked at the director sitting back. 
Sadiq couldn't get the boss to sit down on his knees, because he noticed that the director was looking at him in surprise as if he had a job to do. 
This is the first time I have ever seen such a beautiful and beautiful woman in my life, and I have never seen such a beautiful woman in my life. 
Since he himself learned Arabic letters, Alkei was sent to a rural school at the age of 5. 
Under the leadership of Musar, Abai's evenings were held every month, and the talented young people sang Abay's songs until the morning. 
At one time, samamey moved like a fat Bustard, and Zharkyn's heart fluttered as if hanging on a thread.
His brother was like a man who had jumped into a hard River. 
The head of the bat begins to hurt from the mold, and the blocked ears sometimes “open”. 
On the bank were thick reeds and reeds, so that the boys came to a place in the shade of a chestnut tree, which stood on the edge of the House.
As a result of the accident, the head of the Department of internal affairs of the Ministry of internal affairs of the Republic of Kazakhstan.
He was so excited that he was able to hug his brother, who was standing in the water.
Since my daughter got up early, we arrived in the village before noon.
There was no man in the village streets, because the Lightning was so bright.
I noticed that winter was approaching, because birds were flying on the surface of the water.
We realized that there was an epidemic in the world, because there was a huge queue of people for one drug in polyclinics.  
Since the information was not fully provided, we could not add it to the database.
I had to change school because I couldn't get along with my classmates.
I didn't understand homework, so I went back to school.
If you want to see changes in the world , be this change yourself .
If we subtract all transport costs , then a transit passenger leaves at least $ 200-250 in Kazakhstan if he arrives with us for half a day or a day .
In monotowns , there is basically no advanced training program for teachers themselves , if we consider the problem from the standpoint of digitalization .
But if you do not follow this path , then it will be difficult for you .
If we cannot see some of its data on a real physical object , then the imposition of virtual objects allows us to see more detailed specific digital values of this object .
If we can transfer all this into the concept of " information data " , then further we will be able to move along the beaten path faster .
The importance of this document becomes clear if we consider that no financial center in the world positions itself as a center of attraction for green finance .
If you are registered on the portal, are registered at the dispensary, the system will automatically send you a notification about a scheduled examination.
If you can do this, you will succeed in this business.
The prospects for regional trade and economic cooperation are considered positively, taking into account the alignment of the projects of the Eurasian Economic Union with the Silk Road Economic Belt initiative.
If we switch to blockchain technologies and at the same time formulate the wrong direction, this can become the most dangerous direction in the development of mankind.
If we want good changes in life, we need to start today.
If you decide to attract foreign labor to the company, then you must pay the state for this.
If you are near, we - your children and grandchildren - feel more relaxed.
If you take these words out of context, the concept of modernization of consciousness may seem somewhat strange and incomprehensible to someone.
If we do not unite the efforts of all countries and create a common coalition, it is impossible to defeat terrorism.
If we do not collect material now, then the current processes of globalization and migration of the population to big cities will lead to the fact that this huge folklore and ethnographic material will simply disappear.
If you have them, then your value, as an employee, as a specialist, rises sharply.
If you look at the bridge from above, you can see that its shell resembles the shape of a fish, which is a symbol of the Atyrau region.
If the family has an able-bodied member, then it will receive an additional package - assistance in finding a job, obtaining an education and a profession, obtaining a loan, a subsidized job (approx. For people with disabilities), the opportunity to undergo youth internship (approx. For graduates of colleges and universities ), the possibility of resettlement in regions where there is a need for labor resources.
if a villager takes this loan for the development of animal husbandry or the creation of a cooperative with his colleagues, then this loan is provided at 7% per annum.
If Facebook were a country, it would become the most populous country in the world, overtaking China.
According to the expert, the more diverse data is available, the better the application will be, the better the insights, the better services can be developed.
If the system detects an offense, the protocol is generated automatically and sent to the address of the violator's residence.
If any citizen of Kazakhstan opens an educational deposit in addition to bank fees up to 14%, the state annually charges a bonus on the balance of the amount in the form of 5 or 7%: 5% - for ordinary families, 7% - for children from socially vulnerable segments of the population.
If there is chaos, eternal depression, laziness, bad habits, low values inside, you should not expect a bright life for yourself.
If you save $ 3000 from each operation, then it's not hard to calculate what the grand total is.
You should always know what you want from life, and then you will have it all.
If an investor wants his financial resources to be used to support environmental projects, energy efficiency, waste disposal, green transport, then he, therefore, has the opportunity to issue or become an investor of green bonds.
If this is not enough, then checks will be carried out.
With a mortgage amount of 9.6 million tenge, it will be possible to issue about 100 thousand available loans.
The more investors from the UK or other countries, from different sectors of the economy are considering the possibility of investing in Kazakhstan, the more and more important role the AIFC will play in providing the financial and legal advice they will need.
And third, when you opened the center, there is a hub and a connection with the outside world, you are working on existing technologies, new technologies.
If one hostel has from 300 to 500 places, it means that it is necessary to build 150-200 hostels throughout Kazakhstan.
Those who quickly arm themselves with the tools of the digital economy, digital communications, digital commerce will reach a new level.
If a dormitory is built, then from the day it is put into operation, they will receive the corresponding amount per month per bed.
Now, after a series of discussions with entrepreneurs, we have determined that if the relevant requirements are met, then the business "on wheels" has the right to life.
If something happens to this person tomorrow, he gets sick, or some social moment happens to him, then the state will not be able to help him, because he did not make deductions at one time.
If a person does not have enough collateral, then the state, having considered his business plan, can provide up to 85% of the guarantee for this loan.
If a person has an inner core, he will overcome any obstacles
First, no modernization can take place without preserving the national culture.
Technology is the driving force behind everything and therefore, if clients ask us to help, we do not look at which sector of the economy they are from.
According to the Prime Minister, all achievements would have been impossible without real professionals who honestly work for the good of Kazakhstan.
It is proposed not to apply fines and penalties if the taxpayer acted in accordance with the explanation of the tax authority, and on which the position subsequently changed.
The calculations of the Government of the Republic of Kazakhstan show that if the current growth rates are maintained, Kazakhstan may roll back among the competitive economies of the world.
A university or a construction company, if they do not have land, must take it from the akimat or buy it.
We see that large backbone enterprises, which are the basis of single-industry towns, understand that if they do not modernize, they do not technologically rebuild, then in the next 5-6 years they will become uncompetitive.
Indeed, in the service of the people, the same people, and if they are mentally adult, responsible, then everything - digitalization, process optimization, cost reduction, corruption - in itself will cease to be a problem.
If the turnover is large, then a small business can choose the "simplified declaration" mode - when every six months, 3% of the turnover is paid.
We offer such subsidies, if we build at the expense of the state, then in five years we will use 225 billion tenge, and if we accept the scheme proposed by us, we will use only 20 billion tenge.
If education becomes the main value in the system of values, then the nation will be successful.
And if the economic reform program continues here to create a successful and productive economy, then along with wealth, natural resources, the role of the financial center can be enormous.
If everything goes well, we plan to hold a battle in Kazakhstan.
If the economy does not develop, there will be no decent standard of living, competitive business that creates enough jobs, it is difficult to expect a modernization of the consciousness of an individual person.
If visitors are not satisfied with the available information, they can use the Internet.
If outbreaks of a disease are observed somewhere, all neighboring states are informed about this, and the exchange of information occurs instantly.
If there is food left in the restaurant, then someone might want to buy it.
With a housing cost of 7 million tenge, the monthly payment will be no more than 50 thousand tenge, which is generally acceptable for most working Kazakhstanis.
Agrarian universities will become research, having in their composition research institutes and experimental farms.
The transfer of property to financial leasing is exempt from VAT if the transferred property is purchased without VAT and is included in the list of goods for the SIC.
If you want to change in the future, change today.
Taking into account the new status, the future of the city is foreseen with even greater development.
If you consent, the information will be transferred to a third party.
Taking into account the favorable geographical location and high technical capabilities, the enterprise has a wide field for deliveries to the domestic and foreign markets.
Without teaching children English now, in the future we will not be able to carry out full-fledged training.
We could not have adopted and worked out such a volume of fundamental laws without the fruitful work of the Government.
If we want the Kazakh language to live for centuries, we need to modernize it without burdening it with excessive terminology.
If an employee achieves a result, he receives a bonus.
Kazakhstan can supply agricultural and livestock products to Jordan, and Jordan, in turn, can export vegetables and fruits to us in winter and spring.
If he did not manage to save up for education, he can take an educational loan from banks participating in the state program.
We constantly hold trilateral meetings, that is, if there is a complaint or some kind of request from an investor, we invite him and the party to which there are questions to the ministry.
If he produces more with the same resources, on the same plot of land, with the same livestock, he will earn more money, develop his business, his own business.
If it does not comply with the norms of the Land Code, a prescription is automatically issued.
If the child does not apply for a grant, then he can study with these funds.
If a child enters a grant, then in this case he has the right to use all 3 million, together with the state bonus and bank remuneration, for his other purposes, or he can transfer to a third party, or accumulate further to obtain a different level of education.
The company will be able to deduct half of its revenue without confirmation, and if it starts keeping records of expenses, it will receive bonuses (deductions) for confirming expenses.
If the akim wants to increase the budget, he will be interested in developing a small business in his village.
If enterprises want to be competitive, to enter foreign markets, they must implement digital solutions in production.
If the design and estimate documentation is submitted ahead of time, we are ready to consider and issue an appropriate conclusion as soon as possible.
For example, a family of five, having moved to a village, can count on 571 788 tenge.
Like the world's leading financial centers that have recently been created, such as in Dubai, Abu Dhabi, we plan to not be so dependent on budgetary investments in 3-5 years, to more depend on the possibility of attracting investments.
Challenges such as the risks of a global crisis, conflicts, trade wars, sanctions confrontations, the situation in the Middle East and the Korean Peninsula, which is far from perfect and stable, will not go anywhere in the near future, but, on the contrary, will seriously affect the entire global economic situation.
During his studies, he may not pay the main debt, but pay only the interest debt.
As part of the implementation of investment projects, investors will be able to pick up goods on the basis of an application with the subsequent filing of a declaration no later than the 10th day of the next month.
See how Kazakhstanis successfully integrate into any environment, having found themselves in an unusual socio-cultural environment, for example, while studying or working abroad.
Which, unlike the G7 and G20, will allow consolidating the opinions and interests of all countries and can become an effective tool for finding more balanced solutions.
When the harsh winds blew, we did not build fences, but mills.
If you accumulate at 8500 tenge, then in 10 years until the child finishes school, he will accumulate 1 million tenge.
If you do nothing and live inertly in such a new global reality, then our days are numbered.
If, say, a university does not have its own funds, it can attract investors, it can apply to a bank to obtain preferential loans.
The republican tourist map includes 14 priority projects, of which 7 projects are planned to be implemented in the region.
Since the better the state of the world economy, the higher the prices for Kazakhstani export goods, oil, metals, agricultural raw materials.
So, if this is a young beginner specialist, whose salary is 158 thousand tenge, then under the new system he will be able to receive up to 258 thousand tenge.
Starting this year, subject to the simultaneous employment of at least 5 people, employers are provided with additional subsidies in the amount of 450 MCI (1.082 million tenge).
Tamara Duisenova explained that if family members refuse to conclude such a contract, then able-bodied family members will be automatically excluded from the number of TSA recipients.
In 2018, the volume of transshipment will amount to more than 10 million tons, the share of dry and ferry cargo transshipment will remain at 80%.
If the family has able-bodied members, then that family will receive two social support packages.
With an apartment cost of 12 million tenge, the initial payment (20%) will be 2.4 million tenge, the remaining amount of 9.6 million tenge will be issued by the bank at 7% for 25 years.
If the population of a city reaches two million people, then it becomes economically self-sufficient.
If you follow the path of digitalization, then you have a chance to become competitive, increase your efficiency and productivity.
If after the second stage the specialists prove the presence of hydrocarbon reserves, then the third stage will be devoted to drilling an exploratory well, the depth of which will be about 15 km.
Whoever worked harder will receive a larger pension.
If domestic and foreign investors build their successful economic activities here, this will contribute to the country's entry into the club of thirty world economic leaders.
If there is an opportunity to hold a battle in Kazakhstan, we will facilitate and help this.
If there is a shortage of collateral, you can contact KazAgroGarant, the farmer will be provided with support in the form of guarantees that will cover the insufficient collateral.
If the cargo was delivered by sea, it would take 2-3 times longer.
We understand that the more successful their business in Kazakhstan is, the greater the benefit they will have for the prosperity of our country.
If Kazakhstan becomes a transit hub between India and other countries, then, of course, the economic situation in Kazakhstan will move for the better.
If this specialist also passes the qualification test, then his salary will increase significantly.
A program participant can immediately receive the entire amount of subsidies if he wants to buy a house or apartment.
When it snows, children rejoice
If you're right, they'll figure out the rest.
Until the truth is revealed, he will not calm down.
He couldn't have gotten rid of the wolf if he hadn't taken the gun.
If so many people moved west, how easy it would be for us to become one of them.
If I don't come home, the work will not be over.
If you teach well, you will find support in the future.
The more coal, the stronger the industry.
When it rains, I'll be home.
Even if I don't tell you, you know.
If Zhabay had not left, he would have stopped the guys.
If you don't study, you won't get an A.
You will not understand this topic until you go to the teacher.
If you listen to Shakhanov, it seems that some truth has been revealed.
It is impossible to imagine the future without studying the past.
Shakhanov did not give up until a commission was established to investigate the December events.
When Kunaev showed the things hidden in the closet, the prosecutor Kolinichenko blushed.
If we invest a million tenge, we must earn at least one million hundred thousand.
If we invest a million and get nothing, I don't think this is a pragmatic use of funds.
If we buy new equipment, we need to organize a competition in order to get the cheapest and highest quality, and not what we have.
If we cannot compete here, what can we do in Europe with our product?
If we can intelligently approach the introduction of the Latin alphabet, we will move to a computer language, which will allow our children and us to enter the economic and scientific space.
If you are not at home all day and you come back too late, turn on the lights at home.
If you come home and meet a group of criminals on the stairs or in the elevator, try to track where they are going.
If you are traveling by bus, tram or trolleybus, be careful when entering and exiting.
If you notice that you have lost money, sandbags or other valuables, first look around - they may fall.
If schools do not allow graduates to take UNT, parents or alumni can apply directly to the local education supervision office or registered UNT school camp.
If we think about the future, we need a forward-looking, well-thought-out financial and economic policy.
If we successfully complete all the activities planned for the coming years, the EEC will be able to move to an efficient operating mode in 2015.
If you are a member of the funded system, what are your options for obtaining housing under the Affordable Housing 2020 program and the public housing program?
If we don't raise the retirement age today, we will face the same problem in the future.
If we increase the retirement age from 2018, then we take into account the situation of those who have reached retirement age.
If we green the entire region every year, we will turn Kazakhstan into a green country.
If we continue to forgive, there is no need to punish anyone for a crime.
If we unite our efforts, there will be no insurmountable obstacles for our country.
If we cannot agree, we will turn to the law.
If you expand this paragraph, it will become clear that the Government needs to constantly be in the information space and fully inform citizens about the changes.
If earlier it took 6 hours to register a car, now it is only 1.5 hours.
If we introduce new directions in the real sector, we must understand that human resources must correspond to this level.
If we are developing rural entrepreneurship, then there must be all the necessary infrastructure.
If a neighbor complained about loud noise, the hydroelectric power station came and checked not only the noise, but also the quality of service.
Kyzylorda will become a self-sufficient region that does not need subsidies if we start not only with the implementation of mining projects, but also with the development of raw materials.
If we do not use the money invested in the EXPO, the reputation of the exhibition will be damaged.
If you earn money to build a mansion with an area of 2-3 thousand square meters, you will earn money to pay for all utilities.
The richer you are, the more you spend.
If a citizen committed suicide as a result of not being conscripted into the army, the punishment is increased by 3 times.
If we propose ways to meet these needs, it will open up new opportunities for the economy and progress, that is, for improving the lives of people.
If we decide everything correctly, the whole of Kazakhstan will have access to the cultural values of our country.
If earlier we traveled to Europe to learn how to build a state, an interethnic world, now they come to Kazakhstan and study our experience.
If we had not taken this step, in a month we would have been left completely without gasoline.
If you enter a store in Kazakhstan with a specific bank card, the transaction will go through the interbank system.
Если мы всего этого не сделаем, мы будем безнадежно отставать в мировом развитии.
If I start blaming someone now, nothing will change.
If each of us fulfills his civic duty, our country will have a great future.
If you plan your budget correctly, there will be no budget efficiency issues.
If the savings are not used for their intended purpose, the state fee is returned to the budget.
If we identify priority sectors of the economy that directly contribute to the expansion of the product range, we will be able to maximize the volume of mutual trade.
If tomorrow we export agricultural products to foreign markets, strict veterinary requirements will be imposed on us.
If we reform this activity in the near future, we will be able to become full members of international organizations and conduct an equal dialogue with potential partners in foreign markets.
Even if you live in a shared home, you need to take the necessary security measures.
If they come legally, they will wait as long as they want.
By 2025, the transition of the Kazakh language to the Latin alphabet will only increase the competitiveness of Kazakhstanis.
If someone hops off the bus at the last moment of departure, make sure you have valuables.
If you need to leave your car overnight, park it in a well-lit and well-visible place.
If the qualifications require a higher education, the diploma is submitted together with the application for employment.
Do not use the elevator during an explosion or earthquake.
If Cyprus leaves the Eurozone, the consequences for the island will be very serious.
Without watering, money and labor are wasted - young seedlings dry up.
If oil exporting countries do not start thinking about their prospects after oil production today, they may face many negative developments.
If all our citizens work for the development of our country, we will create a labor society, we will train our youth.
If there are few complaints, then the islanders trust the courts.
If the murders are not solved, they are usually sent to the archive.
If the land is not ready, it cannot be put into operation.
If all farms worked diligently, our country would have a surplus of food.
If there is no market in agriculture and production is risky, the maturity of the loan is deducted.
If the permit is extended during the year, the total amount of payment will be 44 thousand 448 tenge.
If it's an attack aircraft, it reveals the secrets of air combat.
If the ticket cost 1 thousand dollars, Kazakhstanis would pay 155 thousand tenge.
If these facts are repeated, their illegal proceeds will be confiscated and their certificates of accreditation will be canceled.
If oil products come from Russia, as it is now, then the deficit will be covered by these supplies, and no other measures need to be taken.
If earlier, in the event of bankruptcy of an enterprise, one bankruptcy case was initiated, but then two cases of bankruptcy and rehabilitation were considered.
If everyone is successful in doing their job, we can achieve all of our goals.
If our returnees move to areas with a shortage of labor, they will be provided with social benefits.
If we have a surplus of electricity, we can sell it.
If government agencies or other organizations use the information provided by the Committee in violation of the law, citizens can sue for their actions.
If they have the same length of service, they all receive the same salary, as a result of which they are treated the same way and their motivation to work is reduced.
If it is a multi-storey building, there must be a lifting mechanism in it.
If there is a specific project, there will be real help.
As long as a company strictly adheres to all tax or administrative laws, there will be no barriers to selling their products.
If a citizen has a username and password, he can enter his personal account and check his account.
Sometimes the eyelids remain dull, sometimes the facial expression brings a smile.
Kazan got up and sometimes praised his horse, sometimes he praised himself, but when he turned around, everyone was talking about the art of Begil.
The bus goes somehow fast, somehow slow.
The last TV programs were broadcast in Russian, in Kazakh.
Sometimes a steppe with a white wind, sometimes hills with red curls, sometimes lakes with green reeds.
One day she cries, one day she cries and worries.
Sometimes it rained outside, sometimes it snowed.
Once there were blue reed lakes, once there were yellow reed lakes.
Sometimes a steppe with a white wind, sometimes hills with red curls, sometimes lakes with green reeds.
Sometimes the soul needs to breathe, sometimes the soul needs to sing.
Sometimes there are films in the club, sometimes they read interesting reports.
The car accelerates, sometimes slows down.
Sometimes they stop and rest, sometimes they walk for a long time.
Children sometimes sing and sometimes swim in the river.
Sometimes it will rain in the steppe, sometimes it will snow.
Sometimes the birds flew a little lower, sometimes they flew a little higher.
At the mouth of the October sky, sometimes a fire burns, sometimes it burns and flickers.
Sometimes it rained heavily, sometimes it stopped raining.
Nurbek sometimes smiled looking at Tauke, sometimes smiled looking at me.
Aizhan sometimes sings and sometimes plays the dombra.
Sometimes the sky is covered with dark clouds, sometimes it opens up.
My grandmother sometimes sews and sometimes knits.
The excavator raises the long neck and lowers it.
Sometimes Asset lies, sometimes gets up.
Kazakhs sometimes play dombra and sometimes sing.
Sometimes a fire glows under the sky, sometimes a red flame.
Someone stretches this patterned, multi-rhythmic "twenty-five", and one day a gentle brown, wide-breathing "Zhanbota" comes out.
Sometimes you are disappointed in life, sometimes you are happy.
Sometimes you are happy, sometimes you are depressed.
Sometimes you tell me your secret, sometimes you are depressed.
Sometimes they stop and rest, sometimes they walk for a long time.
Children sometimes play football and sometimes swim in the river.
Travelers are sometimes interested in nature, sometimes in the mountains.
Sometimes they line up, sometimes they gather and wait for different guests.
Children sometimes sing and sometimes dance.
Sometimes we cook, sometimes they cook.
Sometimes the car rumbles, sometimes the workers shout for help.
It will rain and snow in the steppe.
Sometimes you create the world, sometimes you have the right to live.
Sometimes your wisdom prevails, sometimes your stupidity prevails.
Sometimes Sakai goes to guard the crop, sometimes me.
The cauldron sometimes glows in the mouth of the sky, and sometimes it glows hot.
It is snowing outside and thunderstorms.
Sometimes he advised and sometimes blamed both of them.
Someone is one step ahead, someone is lagging behind.
The boots sometimes slipped, sometimes they fell.
From the books of Herzen and Chernyshevsky it seems that this is a great mystical truth, which is sometimes achieved, sometimes clearly, and sometimes partially understood.
The fruits of many years of inspiration of the great poet, excited now by the voices of small children, now by the singing of a serious open Indian guy, now by the rhythm of a delicate, sensitive girl-singer.
Only the names of the workers change, sometimes - Kengirbai, sometimes Kunanbai, today - Azimbai.
Probably, it was this construction that later became widespread in the Turkic languages, since "Yryk bitik" is the last work written in the runic alphabet in the 9th century.
Then, firstly, the sequence of this sentence is more accurate than the previous sentences, because such personal adjectives are present in the sentence.
It can be used as an aid in the philological faculties of universities, as well as for research work.
Noun phrases not only give the style clarity and conciseness, but also enhance the beauty of the text and give the text of the work an aesthetic meaning, stylistic, expressive tone.
Fortunatov's school warns that a verb dictionary is not a dictionary, and a verb is not viewed as a dictionary.
The news was broadcast live on television and repeated.
Sometimes she is upset and sometimes she cries.
Sometimes white steppe, sometimes yellow peaks.
Once there was a steppe with white rays, and sometimes there were red curly hills.
Sometimes you need to breathe, sometimes you need warm words.
The club sometimes hosts films and sometimes interesting games.
The car accelerates and sometimes slows down.
They stopped, rested, and ran.
Children sometimes sang and sometimes played football.
It was raining and windy in the steppe.
The birds flew a little lower and a little higher.
At the mouth of the October sky, sometimes a fire shines, sometimes it goes out.
It rained a lot and sometimes it snowed.
Nurgali smiles sometimes at Tauke, sometimes at Samat.
Sometimes Aizhan sings and sometimes dances.
Sometimes the sky is covered with dark clouds, sometimes it is sunny.
My grandmother sometimes carves and sometimes reads fairy tales to her grandchildren.
The excavator lifts the long neck and lifts it up.
Aset runs little and walks little.
Kazakhs sometimes played the dombra, sometimes danced.
Under the sky, the fire sometimes glows, and sometimes it burns brightly.
Sometimes you are disappointed in life, sometimes you are happy to say thank you.
Sometimes you are happy, sometimes you don't talk to anyone.
Sometimes you tell me your secret, sometimes you tell someone else.
They walk slowly and sometimes for a long time.
Children sometimes play football and sometimes play volleyball.
Travelers are sometimes interested in nature, sometimes in the park.
Sometimes in rows, sometimes in groups, children played games.
Children sometimes sing and sometimes play the dombra.
Sometimes we cook, sometimes we buy.
Sometimes the car rumbles, sometimes the sound is slow.
It was snowing and blizzard in the steppe.
Sometimes you make a quick decision with your mind, sometimes you play the slow game with great stupidity.
Sometimes Sakai, and sometimes Aset, go to guard the harvest.
At the mouth of the cauldron sometimes the fire is very hot, sometimes it is hot and flickers.
It is snowing and raining outside.
Sometimes he gave advice, and sometimes he listened to what happened.
Sometimes Dariga wrote a poem, sometimes she wrote an essay.
The poetess sometimes played the dombra, and sometimes took part in aitys.
The poet Aigerim sometimes wrote a song and sometimes sang on stage.
The poet Aigerim wrote a poem in Kazakh and Russian.
Aigerim liked the broad Kazakh soul and was struck by the richness of the Kazakh language.
Darkhan sometimes read a book and sometimes filled out a diary.
On the weekend, he showed a concert on television and a film.
The children sang and played games.
Sometimes the poet wrote a poem about love, and sometimes he wrote a poem about his homeland.
Shairei was stunned by this word, but he thought of Kudabey.
Horsemen and sledges passed by, but Abdrakhman leaned against the window for a long time.
On a beautiful night, he gets up as quietly as possible, but wakes up together.
In a hurry, however, it's a shame not to turn around.
I want to go, but the place is far away.
Dyakoven also tried to find a common language, but he failed.
Mambeth wanted to fire again a second time, but did not receive a pistol.
Every day there is something new, but this news does not excite mom as much as it used to.
This country has always respected Mukhita before, but not to the same extent.
I wanted to say something insignificant, but Shymyrbek fell silent.
He was not an old man, but he suffered from grief.
Shairei was stunned by this word, but he thought of Kudabey.
Horsemen and sledges passed by, but Abdrakhman leaned against the window for a long time.
On a beautiful night, he gets up as quietly as possible, but wakes up together.
These are stingy people who are rich in gold and silver, but do not care about the dead.
The only language mourners are the writers, but so far they have not shown any significant movement.
It could not grow up, but it still has many branches.
Galia knew she was confused, but did not understand why she was confused.
Yerzhan rode well, he dressed well, but he did not know how to look after animals.
Not only wolves and wild boars are scary, but reeds too.
I escaped the wind, but the freezing of my body did not subside.
He is cruel, but that does not mean that he is bad.
I know the pain is intense, but you need to be patient.
However, he quickly realized his mistake and remained calm, not opposing anyone.
Bayan has a good voice, but she is embarrassed to sing.
I don't think I have that kind of talent, but I will dance.
This year the winter was cold, but there was little snow.
The sun went down and no one was looking
I didn't want to go to the theater, but I didn't want to disappoint him either.
You have a lot of knowledge, but you lack experience.
Mist lay at his feet, but a blue sky shone above him.
He searched for the wind for a long time, but there was no wind.
Old firs and cedars have lost their white clothes, but in many places they have covered the ground with large blizzards.
In the ten years that I lived with the Dursleys, some strange things happened, but no one spoke or looked for a reason.
When Voldemort failed to kill Harry, he lost his ability to perform magic, but no one knows why.
Harry escaped from the clutches of Voldemort for the second time, but does not believe that this will last forever.
Harry had learned to ignore his cousin's words, but today he was stunned.
Mrs Potter was Mrs Dursley's sister, but they never saw each other.
The Dursleys know that the Potters also have a young son, but they have never seen him.
It is true that there is a stray cat sitting at the corner of Privet Drive, but no map is visible.
He doesn't know why, but Mr. Dursley shrugged as soon as he saw them.
This group is also whispering, but no one collects money for charity.
I don't know about this, but compared to other things that remind us of today's country, it seems like owls stay on the road.
Professor McGonagall flinched, but Dumbledore, who was sharing the two gummies, didn't seem to notice.
There are twelve arrows, but no number is visible.
The Dursleys had everything they wanted, but they also had one secret.
This woman also wore a cloak, but it was light green, not purple.
He stared at Dumbledore, hoping to hear something from him, but Dumbledore said nothing.
I managed to find in Rio de Janeiro several scientists who were seriously involved in the Great Work, but they avoided meeting me.
He is very demanding, but there is no limit to his kindness.
Nowadays they know their profession, but they also know that the language of alchemy is not about the mind, but about the heart.
He paused, wondering if the gypsy knew what it was, but she said nothing.
In five years, 999,999 stones were broken to find a single gem, but to no avail.
Perhaps I need to learn to trust people, but I cannot change that.
Wealth and fame can be lost, but the happiness in the heart can only be temporarily extinguished.
He seemed to hate me, but that didn't bother me.
Mostly a very smart girl, but lazy.
I want to tell you that I cannot come, but I still need to talk to you.
Anna likes it, but don't tell anyone.
Dark autumn has come, but the sun is still warm.
Dilda felt that Abai was suffering, but she did not regret it.
It was snowing, but it was warm outside.
Daan knows from the very beginning what he is doing, but does not hide it.
When I am sick, I see my soul, but I don’t want to hurt my mother.
I hear voices from afar, but I can't guess where they come from.
The song stopped, but the guitar music didn't stop.
There was a shepherd with him, but he could not keep up with him.
Saule laughed, but he couldn't laugh.
He gave a general description, but did not go over it in detail.
He began to say that the trip was a success, but Ayman left.
He is over ninety years old, but his mind and health are deteriorating.
Many words were said, but he did not remember them.
Soviet power fell, but the momentum is still felt.
I have to get up early tomorrow, but I have a lot of work.
He called, but still he did not come.
On April 11, 1867, the Vernenskaya fortress was renamed, but in the same year, according to the report of the "Steppe Commission", the city was renamed Verny.
I’m better at solving the problem, however, but in reality we both have a low level.
I was fond of drawing a lot, but he really didn't like this business of mine.
I read the book, but it bored me.
I watched a lot of films, but the book was more interesting to read.
We fought a lot in two, but this time was interesting.
There are many people on the street, but few people can help.
I asked him who he would become, he did not say.
He was very upset with me, but I didn't care.
There were electrical fuses in the house, but to fix them, you had to go to the far end of the warehouse.
Reading in German is much easier than before, but I couldn't read myself.
Prayers look so beautiful, but I'm not interested in that.
I asked Margot and Peter if they would like to help, but they were both too lazy.
Our relationship with mom has been getting better lately, but we never speak completely openly.
We immediately started picking apples, but they fell from our hands.
They may not be married, but that doesn't matter.
The answer to my problem was wrong, but the solution was correct.
I am peeling boiled potatoes, however I have finished my work.
He greeted me with joy, but waited a long time at the station.
I'm angry, but I shouldn't show it to anyone.
I probably act like a child, but others don't think so.
I live in Almaty, but I was born in another city.
Margot has stopped correcting the mistake, but I think she will start writing the letter again later.
We waited, waited, but nothing was heard.
We all fell asleep, but we could not sleep.
The sun went down - no one noticed.
He arrived in town yesterday, but his destination address has changed.
I went to play yesterday, but I didn't see Aziza.
We entered the race, but lost to the opposing team.
I went to my mother, but she left.
Winter has come, but the day is warm.
Spring has come, but the day is cold.
It seems that all people know their fate at a young age, but over time, latent power will lead them to a different situation.
The book did not have a cover, but he found the name of the author.
There were no wolves in the area, but sometimes the sheep scattered.
He broke a stone, but to no avail.
People are created to live in harmony, but they cannot follow the desires of their hearts.
He understands that he cannot do this, but he cannot do anything for himself.
Requirements can be set, but in unfavorable conditions they become weak and lazy.
They get tired very quickly, but in a normal environment, for example, at home, such children behave well and study well.
Emotions are born slowly, but differ in depth and strength.
They are very sensitive, keep resentments to themselves and think a lot about them, but they do not show anyone that they have such problems.
Others wanted to become teachers, but when her friends applied to medical school, she also applied.
We have a gender policy, which was also in Soviet times, but was one-sided.
Chingis and Chokan Valikhanovs recorded from within the country, that is, from the Kazakhs, but this version was not immediately published.
The guy announces his choice to the people, but the messenger Kambar does not inform the batyr.
He immediately agrees, but he himself sets the condition for Aiganym's sharp and persistent order.
We do not argue, but we also do not deviate from the truth.
He was determined to fight by force, but this was too little compared to the Russian army.
There Suyunbike endures a lot of humiliation, but the spirit of a proud soul is not broken.
There were many liars in the people, but none of this attracted the attention of the mistress.
Shamanic beliefs do not specify the image of a woman, but warn that women were shamans too.
We can say that fairies and devils are not bad images at all, but we can say that they are the descendants of a special being.
There was a legend a long time ago, but he agrees to this and does not allow him to be killed.
We will not meet for a long time, but I am sure that the victory will be ours.
There will be fear, but when the fire burns, you set your first goal - to save people
My mom is very worried, but she always supports me, as this is my choice.
I have no information about the progress of graduates, but few young people choose this profession.
Last year we had two medals, but every year we took a place in the natural and mathematical direction.
He has forgiven her many times, but there is a limit to forgiveness.
Aydar slammed the door, but less than a minute later he opened it back.
I planned to go on purpose, but I couldn't.
The road to the village was long, but they did not notice how quickly they got there with conversations.
It is hot in summer, but it also rains.
We believe that the larger the head, the smarter, but this opinion is incorrect.
These people were like us, but their cognitive abilities - the ability to learn new things, remember, communicate - were much lower.
Sapiens made much clearer sounds than green monkeys, but both elephants and whales have this ability.
They all depend on information, but they fail to gossip.
Ants and bees are also a large group, but they carry out their duties according to strict rules.
Gossip plays a role, but gossip has its limits.
They hire mechanics, accountants and secretaries, but these people are not employees of the company.
The company has executives and shareholders, but they are not the company itself.
The pedigree of horses and donkeys is not very distant, but they are not alike.
When he graduated from school, the gold medal seemed to be at his disposal, but the only medal received at school went to another child.
In the summer of the same year, he passed the exam at the Faculty of Philology of the university, but received a grade of four in all subjects.
Time is fragmented, however it does not return.
A blow to national identity, but the path to it is difficult.
I could not get an answer in Kazakh, but it was clear from their names and types that they were Kazakhs.
The story takes the reader to the village, but there is no nostalgic nostalgia for the village.
We compare the information about this reservoir, which is found in the literature of the ancient world, in its content, but is of great value for geographical knowledge, in comparison with modern research.
Precipitation also brings salt to the sea, but not in large quantities.
In 1970, the average cotton yield reached 24.8 centners per hectare, but this was due to over-planting, which was not included in the plan.
The water used for the full ripening of rice is 50,000 m3 per hectare, but in many areas, especially in some areas of the lower reaches of the Syr Darya, the actual volume of water used to maintain the water level has reached 80,000 m3 per hectare.
Of these, the volume of non-refundable was estimated at 1.2 km3, but the actual consumption was much higher.
The development of these lands for cotton was carried out through the construction of multi-stage pumping stations, but irrigation erosion, pits, landslides, caves appeared in the soil.
The foothills are suitable for growing fruit and vineyards, but not for cotton, corn or other crops.
The irrigation systems are piped, but very expensive.
Highly fertile gray soils and saline soils are common, but the latter are easily washed off with water.
It does not enter the channel of the Amu Darya, but flows into the Karakum Desert.
Since 1963, the construction of drainage systems began on these newly developed territories, but reclamation construction progressed very slowly.
Hundreds of small lakes and ponds were drained, but the newly reclaimed virgin lands were drained a year later and lost their fertility.
As a result, it was calculated that 70 km of water will be sufficient for irrigation, but this will require 90 km of water.
The western part of this plain is also composed of such alluvial deposits, but there are muddy swamps, meadow bogs, meadow alluvial soils.
There are 34 lakes with an average depth of 1-3 meters, but due to drought in the region, the water mass of these lakes has adapted to decrease rather than increase.
This water has a slightly harsh taste, but is suitable for drinking by animals.
Each type of soil has its own salt regime, but this property is unstable.
People are not allowed to drink, but animals and wild animals do.
The plant community here is richer in species than the emerging groups on the new continental shelf, but the biomass is poor, which is typical of desert plants.
In the southeastern part of the island, there seems to be a saxaul forest covering a large area, but the saxaul forest is being cut down mercilessly.
Before obtaining the status of the Barsakelmes reserve, saigas apparently lived here, but in small numbers.
The species composition of plants is long-lasting, but the biomass continues to decline.
There are not many bird species here, but many locals call the pond a “bird market”.
There is such information, but approximate and not entirely about the Aral Sea.
It is noteworthy that salt contains a high concentration of sodium sulfide, but it is not present in seawater.
Salts may contain magnesium sulfate, but the chloride content is much higher than that of conventional sulfates.
Magnesium also accumulates in the solution, but when the concentration of the solution is low, it is much less than the amount of sodium.
In the summer months, the deposition of calcium salts continues, but mirabilite goes into solution.
In the summer heat, sulfate salts still dissolve, but very slowly and in small quantities.
Reclamation of drylands continues, but is in its infancy.
Sowing was slightly delayed due to organizational work, but did not negatively affect the physiological state of the experimental wheat.
Livestock has a production plan, but it has turned into a lagging industry without care or attention.
In hot summer, he once a day goes to lakes, rivers and lakes to drink water, but carefully quenches his thirst.
A rare migratory bird that lives in the desert, but also seems to live at an altitude of 1800 m southeast of Altai Mountains.
This animal is a close relative of the steppe mink and is very similar to it, but from afar it is a perch.
The wing of the first gate is black and the wing of the second gate is white, but its end is black.
The tail was longer than the body, but very flat.
He swims well in water because his fingers are connected by a flap, but he cannot dive.
The eagle has a small body but long wings.
Found in many parts of the country, but in all regions.
The color of the feathers is the same as that of the large white-tailed deer, but the body is half as large.
He can't dive, but he can swim well.
Russian historiography did not contain special works on the political and administrative structure of Kazakhstan, but some issues related to the organization and activities of the colonial administration were reflected in the works of officials and orientalists.
The value of the facts presented in the documents is undeniable, but distortions of the historical truth, a negative assessment of events prevail in the archival data.
The dead detachment came to the rescue, but when the Khiva army heard about the approach of armed detachments, it withdrew.
On February 26, 1885, the military governor of Turgai proposed to the Ministry of Internal Affairs to strengthen police protection in the counties, but the regional administration continued to organize measures to "strengthen control over public order."
He returned to Orenburg, but instructed the junior assistant to the head of the district to carry out the most important work for the state.
It is located in the Urals, but it is forbidden to send Kazakhs there.
There are different definitions of discourse, but not all of them are the same.
This is the story they all told, but the syntactic structures that they each chose as a sentence were different.
We did not come across the phenomenon of grammatical aphasia, but there were deviations in the choice of grammatical structures in the description of Russian-speaking students.
We consider a linguistic person to be a person with a mind, certain knowledge, worldview, psychology, living action, but there is a difference between a linguistic person and a communicative person.
The main character of the film is Mansur, but most of the film's narrators describe him as Abylai Khan.
Discourse is understood only as an act of speaking, but in the theory of discourse there are scholars who believe that discourse can only be oral, but also written.
The text is in language, but lives in discourse.
A newborn child repeats what he hears without understanding it, but later understands its meaning.
Many words can be translated from one foreign language, but for communication purposes it is not necessary to know the language at a high level.
I tried to go down to the bottom of the well, which seemed deep, but there was a hole in the bottom.
It looks like a voice is heard, but I can't guess where it comes from.
My father had serious wounds from spears and swords on his head and body, but they were safe and sound, and they could be healed in a few days.
He is handsome as a child, but his clothes are torn and he is barefoot.
Yes, I wrote, but these skills have been known for a long time.
There was no "user interface", but it first appeared on the Macintosh, then on Windows.
Gates, who presented his knowledge of the program, was found on time, but there were other programmers, experienced engineers, and scientists in government labs.
Thousands of people could have done what Bill Gates did at the time, but they couldn't.
Gates deserves to be a role model, but I can tell others.
I have learned a lot, but still I cannot say that I live as happily, productively and carefree as I want.
I want my kids to value their work and learn, but I have to constantly push them to spend.
I can't say that we are fighting, but we no longer love each other.
There are some differences in the ways in which fairness is defined and in explaining the pursuit of fairness, but no one disputes the general idea of ​​fairness.
You can buy a human hand, but you cannot buy a soul.
You can teach them how to answer, but they cannot take responsibility for what they learn.
You can work without giving up, but your efficiency may be low.
It is true that we are limited, but we can move this tight circle that constricts our breathing.
There are many ways to think, but we cannot use this potential.
Obviously, these matters are very important, but not urgent.
The offer was not very interesting, but it was inconvenient to refuse.
Engaged in developing behaviors and goals, but does not intend to look at the "root" - the basic paradigms from which these goals and behaviors grow.
Sometimes we do things to temporarily relieve pain, but the disease is chronic and we gradually adapt to it.
Honesty includes honesty, but it's a broader concept.
I may not say this, but I am saying this because you are my friend.
The law provides life, but does not create synergy.
Look, Stephen, the Win / Win idea is certainly very interesting, but too idealistic.
I bravely defend my faith, but I don't pay much attention to yours.
Everything you say is beautiful, beautiful, but it has nothing to do with me.
He was not our family doctor, but he had to be on duty that day.
Sandra and I wanted to leave, but we couldn't leave Jenny.
Studying some subjects may seem like a waste of time, but in my later life, these subjects proved to be very useful and relevant.
I tried, but it was all in vain.
He wanted to help his son, but did not try to understand his son.
They speak too politely, but without sympathy.
They know how to reasonably understand each other, but do not delve too deeply into the paradigms and judgments underlying the positions of their colleagues, and do not open up new opportunities.
A TV can be as good an employee as our body, but it cannot be a good boss.
We can live as we please, but the consequences of our behavior still come from principles, not values.
We can gain temporary popularity, but in the end, the loss of integrity destroys everything.
These skills are easy to understand but difficult to maintain.
We have them, but we do not always keep them.
The board of directors is scheduled for two in the afternoon, but you don't know what the problem is.
We want love, but we don't love responsibility.
I have never held a responsible position, but I felt a huge responsibility for fulfilling my mission.
Since Abai was such a small man, only the poet Erbol, the poet did not deny that he came alone.
After a long period of violence and hostility, I will be a friend of the people, not a father.
Because of the presence of horizontal people, he was often asked to take care of the farm.
When Shuga became really ill, Esimbek told me not to close his mouth.
There was no intercessor, and they were both very tired.
The window is always dark after the cold outside and the heat inside.
Azimbay deliberately kept quiet so that Erbol would not find out.
I don't have a book, so I'm not well prepared.
Since Abai had not yet commented on the share, Takezhan asked him about his intentions
You are ashamed and embarrassed because he was abused by your brother.
Since not all the guys were there, Bazarly's unknown business was stalled.
For the last two or three years, he has been constantly trapping Abai's head.
When you're short of breath in the scorching heat, you beat yourself up and look for the wind.
As Senge began to look like a bird of the year, Olzhabek had a world of hope.
When the wolf ignored the cry, Jesus took a different approach.
He could not come on time, and we were a little late. The next day they went to the Revolutionary Committee in search of bread.
At night, the horseman fell asleep and smelled a thick horse.
When Raushan arrived, she turned and walked towards the village.
As it is the first work to be published, this anthology may have some shortcomings.
Our body became heavier because we had not exercised for three or four days.
We were deceived into believing that we would not be able to reach the rabbit that ran away from the foot of the rock.
The wind was blowing harder and harder.
Unfortunately, I found a generous sponsor, so this book was not in my archive as it was written.
Marat and I had been filthy for two months.
Since he could not sleep at night, Saken staggered and walked like a fish.
Dissatisfied with what he wrote, Saken tore the paper.
After pouring fresh milk into the straw and cooking it often, the bubble drink is ready.
In Kazakhstan, civic dignity is first and foremost a sign of wealth, so people try to show off their jewelry when talking to strangers.
Because of the harsh punishments applied to the Kazakh people, the horrible forms of punishment will forever remain in the minds of wise girls.
During the mound, the soil was mixed with stones, so walnuts and wormwood on the mound give a special charm.
It was a cold autumn day, so it was cold.
Kazybek's riding coincided with the difficult fate of his people, so he rode fast, dressed beautifully, and could not survive.
The judges were impressed by the business acumen and talent, and if necessary, they presented this compelling evidence.
When you hear Abai's high, muffled voice, you can imagine the pattern and order of the fundamental dances.
Since Abay was well versed in the versions of ancient Turkish literature, Abay consciously took the necessary words from these languages ​​without difficulty and without hesitation.
Al-Farabi's philosophy is so comprehensive in matters of worldview that many of his works are unknown to us.
Due to the system of self-government of our people, the words of the famous Kazakh dancers Kazybek, Tole bi, Aiteke have not been interrupted for centuries.
The snow was heavy at night, and the animals were not ready to go.
After the tea table was set, the guests began to leave.
I don't like this study, so I want to leave this village.
Because talent itself is different, so are the requirements.
Since we have our own children, we can't tell this secret to anyone.
Since the earth's surface is mountainous, the country may not be indisputable.
Since the enemy was using all the tools at his disposal, the defending hero took a different approach.
As the country was not able to fully develop the forest, he asked for help from a neighboring village.
Askar was busy and could not contact the village
David could not fly because the swallow had cut off David's wings
Not paying much attention to what was said about her, Sholpan got out of the boat.
They did not file a complaint because Zhamantai's condition was bad.
Magali finished her speech quickly because of the noise.
Now he has changed both his beard and his clothes, so the image has also changed.
No one was silent, and everyone knew the old woman's voice. 
He did not seem to notice the excitement, for he had turned his attention to the fact that Abdrakhman's appearance had changed without recognition. 
He did not deny that the party that entered the village late in the evening was a group of horsemen, feeders led by Belov, because there were no other soldiers on guard there.
I was on the side of sadirbai, because I have a voice that reads the Koran beautifully. 
At that time, Uncle Shaim was engaged only in making clothes, because he was "godless" in the country. 
He didn't know what she was saying, or why she was saying it, because he didn't know that Ray was his future daughter-in-law.
They can't walk today, no matter how fast they hurry, because the road is covered with snow.
I'm not afraid, I'm not afraid, my grandmother asked me yesterday.
My father briefly told Zhumabay who I was, so he spoke to me without hesitation.
He had a great reputation for hard work, so all the workers under his supervision knew what he was talking about.
He stood with his head bowed, for he did not feel that he was being insulted, and so he did not look at the two of them.
These four, who had escaped from the hunter like a wolf, were going to cross the Black Road from a distance, because on the road there were eight horses, led by Nurysh and Baky.
Our current information age is leading to rapid and very high growth in the world of data mining, which is why it requires effective methods, methodologies and tools to analyze various types of data.
Regression analysis allows you to model the relationship between a dependent variable and one or more independent variables, since this method is used to predict values based on a specific data set.
In the era of big data, every scientific region must find a way to solve problems related to the storage, processing and interpretation of large amounts of information, as data management and Exchange are an important component of scientific work.
The growing number of data places new demands not only on the qualification of scientists, but also on the material support of research, because it is very important to make data accessible to a wide audience.
Big data makes it easier to collect information about various events that indicate the likelihood of an earthquake, so it uses it to make predictions more accurate. 
In the Information System, data analysis is performed through the BI platform and the result is displayed in the interface via the PHP language, since the descriptive analysis method was used in the system.
Data analysis and visualization are performed in a single window, so you can access new information by selecting the necessary data and setting some conditions for it.
After all, I must either leave the midst of these people, or put into my soul the evil that will be restless.
He left himself, or they would have left him.
Words and actions will warm the cold fun or cool the warm fun.
He left himself, or they would have left him.
On a day off, we either watch teli gifts or play chess.
Do you cook or do you clean a house?
I have to either be at the meeting today or watch the preparation.
We must finish the house as soon as possible, otherwise you don't know where to go if Winter falls.
I either have enough or not enough.
Alternately, the bucket is either turned over by the machine, or pulled out by rotating the horse.
Either I had anger or a new fear appeared in my eyes.
Whether you go to the cinema or the circus today, I will prepare for tomorrow's exam.
Whether you go to the cinema or the circus today, I will prepare for tomorrow's exam.
You need to ask the animal either from the ground or from sweat.
I don’t have this sign, or do you not see?
Either you live here or I live here.
Are you driving directly from the village or have you been to villages along the way?
Dauletkeldy expects something interesting from his words or something interesting from his shortcomings.
You need to quickly call a doctor or go to the hospital.
You give me my salary, or we will say goodbye.
Whether he was sick or remembered yesterday, today he did not speak to anyone.
Either I go, or you have to see him off.
It's good that you came, otherwise I would have left myself.
He escaped, otherwise we would have left on our own.
Get to work now, or I'll kick you out.
The dough is cut into large pieces or use hard flour pasta.
Are you the moon in the sky or a flower on the earth?
I don't remember when Aisha arrived, after her marriage or before winter.
Regardless of whether he trusted the post office or wanted to send it through me, he took a ready-made white bag out of the drawer and handed it to me.
Whether you were a mediator of good or a keeper of evil, what is the point of sitting next to the khan, because you know two words?
Are you walking straight or did you hit the village on the road?
When overwhelmed and harshly criticized, his father leans forward in his sleep or asleep.
During the day they seek food for themselves or do not want to be food for others.
This shows that newcomer Cooken believes in this witness, or shows the connection that the country wants to criticize and pull to the top.
He can be a wise or stupid person.
It is snowing or raining today.
Whether he was afraid to be alone or wanted to speak slowly, he wanted Andrei to be with him today.
Either my heart will win or my fist will win.
Words and deeds warm the cold or cool the heat.
The subcondition does not matter, whether it has a periodic meaning or any other meaning.
In any language, intonation plays a vital role in expressing whether a person is full of thoughts or not.
Each component of a compound sentence is pronounced in a slurred or somewhat slurred voice, and the final intonation occurs at the end of the sentence.
The narrator of the subordinate component of an adjacent compound sentence noted that the presence of a pronoun in the form of a noun or other pronoun is reflected in the function of the subordinate clause.
Subordinate pronouns are mastered according to the type of the narrator's name, or according to the corresponding type of adverbs, or according to auxiliary words of the same meaning.
Simple sentences in a related sentence are always formed by a certain union or auxiliary words used in the union sense.
Therefore, in general linguistics (Russian linguistics), noun phrases are recognized only as incomplete sentences or sentences without a face.
A simple sentence in any language consists of a synthesis of two main components - the initial and the narrator or the subject and the predicate.
This is because a compound noun sentence and an adjective or noun phrase do not have the same meaning.
Countable nouns are used at the end of a sentence or as an independent incomplete sentence and serve as a storyteller.
Pronouns come in many different forms, be they simple sentences or compound sentences.
Whether he believed in Askar's politeness or understood his sisters as children, neither his brothers nor his daughter-in-law showed any signs of protection.
Blessings are given either by an older person or by a respected person.
Whether he saw it with his own eyes or heard it with his ears.
Either you live here or I live here.
Are you driving directly from the village or do you get to villages by road?
Dauletkeldy expects something interesting or something interesting from his words.
On weekends we go either to the mountains or to the village.
Are you preparing lessons or playing games?
Today I have to be in class or get ready.
It is necessary to decorate the house as soon as possible, otherwise they will not know where to hide in the summer heat.
Are you going to work today or not?
The key must be asked either from the person who was there yesterday, or from the guard.
Don't you have this book or is Samat in front of me?
This miracle cannot be described by sight or hearing.
There should be a place for rest or parking.
Aset expects something interesting or something interesting from his words.
Call your doctor early or go yourself.
You raise my salary, otherwise I will leave.
Today he did not speak to anyone, whether he remembered yesterday's incident or was ill.
You have to take it out, or I'll go.
It's good that you came, otherwise I would send someone for you.
He left, otherwise he would have been told to leave.
Do it now or leave.
Finely chop the dough or use dough products.
I don’t remember when he arrived, neither after his arrival in the village, nor before moving for the winter.
Regardless of whether he did not trust this person or wanted to give it to me, he took a white parcel from a drawer and handed it to me.
Did you hit the village on the road or did you have to stay away?
They rest during the day or try not to eat.
It was either a great ability or a moment.
It will rain or it will be sunny tomorrow.
Whether he wanted to be alone or to leave as soon as possible, Andrei was not worried today.
Either you win or I win.
Words and words can warm or cool a person's heart.
He must either join these people or do good deeds that will help everyone.
Will you go to the cinema with us or will you go to the mountains?
I have to be at work today or wait for you.
You need to finish the job as soon as possible, otherwise you won't know where to go if you leave.
Whether he saw it with his own eyes or heard it with his ears.
Dauletkeldy expects to benefit from this knowledge or character.
We need to call a taxi home early or take our own car.
You can go to work either by my car or by bus.
It's good that you came, otherwise I would have invited the workers.
Tell us about your childhood memories or a recent event.
We need drastic changes, otherwise we will lag behind.
What do we need to overcome the transition period and what is its significance?
Prepare well for tomorrow's race, otherwise it will be difficult to win a prize.
Either go faster or wait.
Do young people want to go to the city or stay in the countryside?
Did Daulet want to go to the library or playground after school?
Have you seen or heard about the achievements of the independent country.
He had so much patience-he could not come to terms with the difficulties he saw.
The beauty of the nature of my native land is so great-that it is impossible to describe in words.
So much so that I was satisfied-I thanked him.
Anger didn't suit me either.
The contestants have so much knowledge-they answered every question without delay.
We liked the lesson so much that we didn't know that time had passed.
In Atyrau, it's so hot that even the consumables are burning.
He's so bored that he doesn't look away.
The sun is so hot that you can fry eggs.
The man was so crowded that there was no place to sit.
Aitys was so controversial that people showed curiosity and interest.
It's so dark in the steppe that you can't see anything around you.
The wrestlers are so strong that they fought for a long time without being able to defeat each other.
When he entered the house, Jumabai shivered, and it became clear that the steppe was cold.
Students have such a thirst for knowledge, librarians work tirelessly until the evening.
The wolves are rabid, and so they went until they arrived in the village.
Azamat was so tired that he could not have lunch and fell asleep.
Maria missed her son so much that she hugged her son from the army for a long time.
The length of the road is such that pedestrians had to stop twice on the road and breathe.
The fire was so intense that it seemed as if thunder and earth were beating together
A person is not bothered by two things: one is a good character, the other is a kind word.
Three things are the qualities of a person: a hot figure, a bright mind, a warm heart.
The fog is so thick-you can't see the lint.
I was so scared that I couldn't get up.
The reason for his absence is this: he returned late from work yesterday.
At one turn of the rim, the track split into two: one went forward along the rim, the other down.
The flood waters were so strong that they covered everything in their path.
Calm Olzhabek was so frightened that he stood up abruptly.
The beef is so nutritious, the taste is indescribable.
Baizhan had only one thing that he was not used to: insects and frogs on the Syr Darya River.
His song amazed the children so much that they seemed to be able to see that partisan.
Many have focused on two issues: one is the task of planting fruit and the other is the task of planting trees.
Everyone has a path: a swan in the sky, a butterfly in the grass.
He was so patient that he never gave up.
He was so pleased - that he thanked me a lot.
He was so angry that he could not speak.
The students of the competition were so knowledgeable that they answered all the questions without hesitation.
The administration reminds: to prepare students for writing scientific papers from an early age.
The thickness of these pipes is such that they can be operated by people like Beisen.
He is so angry that sparks of anger are reflected on his face.
He was so scared he didn't know what to say.
The content of the explanatory field is to explain, supplement the idea, define the idea.
I want to tell you: send me to flight training.
There is a Kazakh proverb: a precious stone, an age of art.
A lie is like a wound: even if it passes, it remains.
Everyone was delighted: someone waved his hands, someone shouted his name.
When the sun rose at five o'clock, the village of Korkemtai was in disarray: the old woman was crying from humiliation, the young people were like a fish in blood.
Kokozek deceived Ushakov: he had problems, but nothing came of it.
Their upside-down shadows in the water are different, some of them look like a blue saukele falling into the water, and now some of them look like big hats shaking their feathers.
Children also find a way to get into the nest: they knit boots made of young cotton fabric, put on cotton gloves so as not to cut their ankles.
The lyrics of the poem seemed to fit the current situation - they greeted the song with a smile.
As a result, the ruin of the farm was so strong that barefoot, slender, educated children were not even attracted to the farm girls.
I suffered so much from such unconscious behavior that I even tried to flee to Russia again.
In addition, the Chinese red tea dress is so long that several girls are holding onto the hem with their fingertips.
According to the author, such a small population is a serious threat to national security.
According to Kamila, the reason for this conflict was her husband's unemployment.
I think let's make up.
In this regard, the scientist said: “The difference between a simple sentence and a compound sentence is that a simple sentence consists of separate words and phrases, and compound sentences consist of several simple sentences (syntactic components).
The main features of the compound sentences of the Kazakh language are: The independence of thought, expressed in the syntactic components of the compound.
When divided into related and unrelated branches, related branches are divided into seven types: compound, contradictory, accelerated, selective, causal, sequential, neutral related sentences.
For example, the word "otherwise" is used in two meanings: basic and connecting.
In traditional grammar, the main features of the subordinate clause are: independence of thought.
Professor Balakayev defines a sentence as follows: "A sentence is a sequence of words that express a more complete idea based on a predicate relationship."
Positive suggestion: The brown horse has a bridle and saddle.
Negative sentence: wealth is not ideal, absence is not a shame.
The complete offer: the beauty of a tree is a leaf, the beauty of a person is a fabric.
An ambiguous sentence: The mood of the mother is in the child, the mood of the child is in the field.
Baitursynov defines a simple sentence as follows: "All sentences spoken without a question, without words, without wishes, are called simple sentences."
In the example given in the author's subordinate clause, we can find a compound sentence with the title: "He who is lazy has no companion."
Sauranbayev divides compound sentences into two groups: related compound sentences and related compound sentences.
When Zhumabay entered the house, he was shaking so much that it was evident that he was frightened.
The students were so eager to learn that the librarians began to work until evening.
The road was so long that pedestrians had to stop and rest on the road.
Three things are human qualities: warmth, a radiant mind, and a warm heart.
He was so scared that he could not speak.
The reason for his absence was that he had returned late from a trip yesterday.
The avalanche was so strong that it covered everything in its path.
Sick Olzhabek was so frightened that he could not speak.
This is how beef is bred - the meat melts in the mouth.
There was only one thing Samal could not get used to: mosquitoes along the Syr Darya and insects such as insects and frogs.
His song impressed the audience so much that it seemed as if they were really watching the partisans.
Many focused on two issues: one - study, the second - work.
He was so pleased - he never stopped giving thanks.
He was so angry that everything was visible on his face.
The contestants were so knowledgeable that they answered all the questions without hesitation.
These pipes are so thick that small children can handle them.
He is so angry that he even fuels anger.
He was so scared he didn't know what to say.
There is a Kazakh proverb: if you work, you will be satisfied without begging.
Everyone was delighted: someone waved his hands, someone shouted his name. Children also find a way to go there: they knit young cotton boots and cotton gloves on their feet so that their feet do not slip.
The lyrics of the poem seemed so appropriate to the situation - everyone sang the song by heart.
In addition, the silk dress is so long that several girls are holding onto the hem with their fingertips.
All I can think of is buying this home.
He was so patient that no matter how much he feared, he never gave up.
He was so happy that he got up and danced.
The competition was so good that the game lasted a long time.
I liked the book so much that I did not know that it was over.
In the north, the sun is so cold that even cars cannot move.
She missed him so much that she hugged him when he finished.
The reason he didn’t come was because he was invited to work.
He didn’t want to leave today, and besides, it was a cold day.
The meeting ended, and the people began to disperse.
Toleutai joined the army and never returned.
The wrestler Zhanay was a strong man, and he was a man with a heart of steel, who always leads the fighters.
He himself does not creep into anyone, but he is also cold to people.
The next day it smelled strange, and there was some kind of turmoil in the distance.
The singer has a pleasant voice and the song was melodic.
The singer has a pleasant voice and the song was melodic.
Construction work has begun and the builders need to be resettled.
An engineer who does not understand art is a bad engineer, a designer who cannot imagine - not a designer, a scientist who does not feel music and does not understand the wonders of poetry - just a self-centered person.
When the primer of the rifle is decelerated, the bolt spring is compressed and potential energy is accumulated.
Shadows of fountains flickered on the surface of the pool, cypress leaves rustled, and at that moment the doors of the palace, which were indescribably majestic, slowly opened.
Uncle Tumarbai invited me to visit, and Gaukhar and I went there.
Daryn began to play the dombra, and Almesh began the pet song "Boztorgay".
Now the trees don't rot and a lot of land has been saved.
Askar was not a singer and his voice was low.
He has a jet-black mustache and a new piggy beard.
The manager checked the work and monitored the implementation of the plan.
Coal produces both oil and iron coke.
I was silent here and did not see the need to speak
The sun went down and the mountain was dark.
Moldakim and Andijan weighed two bundles of wool, and it turned out seven kilograms fourteen grams.
Kadyr has thin clothes and is not well.
Among the visitors are elderly people like Dandybai and Erenai, whom Abai already knew, and two or three middle-aged people.
Mendykyz looked at Khakim, and Alibek looked at Mendykyz.
He went down a steep path, and I went up a steep path.
Such roads are very expensive to build and cannot be built anywhere.
Thousands of hectares of hay will be cut and dozens of barns will be built.
This year I was in Zhailau and was at my uncle's house.
Ospan ran and I followed him.
I have no documents or house number.
An engineer who is not versed in art is not an engineer, an architect who cannot imagine is not an architect.
They went down and the road split in two.
They gave me a toy and a ball to my brother.
Some time ago two horsemen came and untied me from the tree.
Admission and academic success are completely objective and do not depend on any subjective factors.
Currently Astana is the leader of the international anti-nuclear movement and makes a significant contribution to ensuring strategic stability and justice in the world.
At the moment, the process of legal deployment of all areas of the AIFC is underway and key partners have already been identified in creating a regional hub that can attract international business circles that are interested in investing in emerging markets.
Prime Minister of the Republic of Kazakhstan Bakytzhan Sagintayev got acquainted with the development of infrastructure facilities of the regional center and visited the bridge over the Irtysh River.
JSC National Company Kazakh Invest is a national agency for attracting investments in the Republic of Kazakhstan, which provides a full range of services to support investment projects from idea to implementation on the principle of "one window" and acts as a single coordination center for the SEZ of the Republic of Kazakhstan.
In order to spread PPP mechanisms, a lot of work has been done, the wishes of businessmen have been taken into account and more flexible tools for the development of partnerships have been developed.
A. Mamin spoke about the measures taken by the Government to further improve the business environment and talked about the progress in the implementation of tasks in the field of modernization, diversification and digitalization of the economy.
The International Center was created on the basis of the legacy of the International Exhibition "Expo: Energy of the Future" held last year in Astana and is a continuation of the Green Bridge Partnership Program, designed to enhance the "green" economic growth in the region.
With the implementation of all five production cycles required for the project, the investment will amount to about $ 10 billion and will contribute to the creation of about 10 thousand jobs.
We continue to work systematically to develop infrastructure around growth points, and we also continue our work to develop roadside services.
At the council, representatives of Kazakhstani companies can discuss the latest trends in the engineering industry, expand the network and find new business partners, discuss and develop new projects, initiate cross-border contacts, learn about the latest Austrian technologies and know-how.
As part of the automation of the SEZ "Khorgos-Vostochnye Vorota", a unified Information System "Nomad" was developed, which ensured the automation of business processes and reduced the time of inspection procedures from 24 hours to 30 minutes.
Has 40 years of experience in international research and policy analysis on investment and enterprise development, facilitates intergovernmental consensus building and provides technical assistance to more than 160 countries.
At the end of last year, trade between the countries amounted to $ 374.2 million and increased more than threefold compared to 2015.
The slowdown in global growth and, especially, the financial crises have a strong impact on Kazakhstan through changes in the conjuncture of world commodity markets, and this factor during a period of slowdown in growth and aggravation of systemic problems of the world economy will increase its impact on the country's economy.
The organization of young business leaders was founded in 1950 by Ray Hickock in New York and initially consisted of 20 members.
The use of the new technology will make it possible to clean the storage device up to environmental requirements, which, accordingly, will improve the quality of the ecology of the city and the region.
This greatly simplifies procedures and, most importantly, will accelerate the inflow of investments to Kazakhstan.
To attract investments in new projects, together with the akimat of the Kyzylorda region, preliminary work was carried out to analyze potential niches and specific projects were identified to attract investors.
The modernization of the Shymkent Oil Refinery started in 2011 as part of the State Program of Forced Industrial and Innovative Development and includes 2 stages.
All these laws, important for investment, have already been discussed in the Mazhilis, and after consideration in the Senate, all 4 bills will be submitted for signature to the Head of State in the near future.
A local police service and community councils have been established to deal with citizens' complaints about police actions.
The Center-South transport corridor, the reconstruction of which began in 2015, will contribute to the development of transport and logistics potential and will allow Kazakhstan to integrate into world transport routes and increase the volume of transit international traffic.
The state sets the rules for doing business, and it demonstrates its readiness for change.
WHO Deputy Director General Jane Alison noted the importance of adopting a new WHO declaration in Kazakhstan and expressed gratitude to the Government of the country for the initiative to hold the Global Conference in Kazakhstan.
The technologies of these works will be studied within the framework of the student research program "Zhas Galym" and will be further developed and promoted by the office of commercialization of the university with the assistance of the Akimat of Pavlodar region.
Over the past two years, we have adopted several special programs for small aircraft and we plan to get down to their realization in earnest.
This project was initiated by the Ministry of Energy of the Republic of Kazakhstan and is aimed at geological study of deep-lying horizons of the Caspian Basin to assess its resource potential.
The bank was established on December 25, 2015 by the entry into force of the Articles of Agreement of the AIIB and officially began its activities on January 16, 2016.
In 2012, Kazakhstan became a member of the Global Forum on Transparency and Information Exchange, and today the country is undergoing a Peer Review on the implementation of transparency and information exchange standards.
The Ministry of Agriculture of the Republic of Kazakhstan needs to pay special attention to ensuring phytosanitary safety and take measures for the timely processing of areas with plant protection products from diseases and pests.
In addition, according to him, a new regulatory framework for Eurocodes has been introduced and a full transition to this system will be carried out by the end of 2019.
In general, the teaching hours in the curriculum will be reduced, and what combinations will be adopted will depend on how correctly and how the educational organization chooses its direction.
In this case, it is noteworthy that the President understands what worries them and takes concrete measures to improve the conditions for their lives.
An annual survey of satisfaction with the quality of the provision of public services is carried out, and today this figure is 83%, i.e. these are visitors who have remained satisfied with our work.
The growth dynamics of the construction industry, having increased to 5.9% in the first half of the year, slowed down in July (0.7%) and approached zero value for 8 months to 0.1%.
The President of the Republic of Kazakhstan took part in the opening of the Hilton Hotel, and also visited the pavilions of Expo-2017
The company has been operating in Kazakhstan since 2004 and is a participant in Tasbulat Oil Corporation LLP (100%) and Kom-Munai LLP (95%, 5% are Kazakh partners), which in turn are holders of the subsoil use right for the Aktas, Turkmenoy, Tasbolat and Komsomolskoye fields in the Mangistau region.
It was completely optimized, and ineffective drugs that are no longer used anywhere in the world have gone.
Foreign publications wrote a lot about Kazakhstan, and quite often quoted the words of maestro Domingo that Kazakhstan made a huge leap forward in a short time.
Despite all the difficulties, the field was launched, and in 2017, 5 million tons of oil were produced.
Our country supports the development of the international megaproject "One Belt - One Road" and is ready for full-fledged integration with the New Silk Road.
Since the beginning of this year, the level of annual inflation has been within the established corridor (6-8%) and amounted to 7.3% by the end of November.
The world is changing rapidly and the labor market must itself, without government intervention, form a new culture.
The Government takes all the necessary decisions and in a timely manner considers the issues of changing the legislation in the field of PPP.
The question of the deputy of the Mazhilis of the Parliament Mikhail Chirkov was addressed to the Prime Minister and was devoted to the efficiency of the budget funds.
The Atlas will be developed as a website and will be updated regularly.
At the same time, the results of monitoring the customs declaration of goods imported into the Eurasian Economic Community member states were summed up and the issues of creating a Commission for the investigation of aviation accidents within the Union were considered.
According to preliminary estimates, ICAO experts note significant progress in Kazakhstan and it is expected that we will seriously improve the indicators in the ICAO rating.
At the same time, traffic safety will increase and the ecological situation in the areas adjacent to the road will improve.
It is also worth noting that the manufacturing sector, even in the last two difficult years, has shown positive dynamics and, in terms of the nominal volume of production, has already exceeded the volume of production in the oil and gas sector for two years.
As a result of the event, the German side highly appreciated the significance of the economic reforms being carried out in Kazakhstan and expressed interest in further cooperation.
120 projects were introduced for 1.5 trillion tenge of investment and 10 thousand permanent jobs were created.
Today, 469 people with disabilities are employed in various positions in the State Corporation, and the work on further employment of this category of citizens will continue.
In 2017, a risk analysis was carried out and due to the high number of self-employed population, the time frame for the implementation of compulsory health insurance was postponed.
During the meeting, the akim of the Kyzylorda region K. Kusherbayev reported on the interim results of the implementation of the President's Address and reported on the dynamics of the socio-economic development of the region.
M. Al-Gargawi noted the high level of the first Summit of the Organization of Islamic Cooperation in Science and Technology and Expo-2017 in Astana and expressed the hope that the experience of Kazakhstan will contribute to the worthy holding of the next International Exhibition "Expo-2020" in Dubai.
The Minister of Health of the Republic of Kazakhstan E. Birtanov spoke about the advantages of the new system of compulsory social health insurance and explained the ongoing work on PPP projects in the health sector.
The parties also considered the issues of the activities of the Intergovernmental Kazakh-Belarusian Commission on Trade and Economic Cooperation and discussed the upcoming 13th meeting of the Commission, which will be held in Kazakhstan in September this year.
This will increase the output of light oil products and bring their quality up to environmental standards K4 and K5.
Trade, economic and investment cooperation is progressively developing, promising joint projects in energy, industry, infrastructure, high technologies and other areas are being implemented.
All preparatory work has been completed, and in early July of that year it is planned to launch the construction of the first stage of the Saryarka gas pipeline.
Its implementation will give impetus to the further development of PHC around the world and will contribute to the formation of a new role for Kazakhstan in modern global health care.
In general, the adopted standards will allow to ensure the annual dynamics of the increase in the volume of housing commissioned by 8% or more than 8 thousand dwellings per year and to bring the indicator of housing provision by 2030 to 30 m² per person.
Professor of the Mimar Sinan University of Fine Arts, historian Abdihuacap Kara highly appreciates the voiced proposals and believes that they will have a qualitative impact on improving the social situation of citizens.
Artificial intelligence can quickly study a patient's medical history and suggest the most effective treatments for doctors.
The bill was approved by the Mazhilis and is currently in the Senate of the Parliament.
All regions took part in the construction of Astana, and today people from all regions live here.
The company started its activities in Kazakhstan in 1993 and is one of the first large investors in our country.
In general, all the planned activities will be completed on time and the work carried out by the ministry on the execution of orders is focused on achieving specific results.
The conducted brainstorming sessions will allow finding approaches and proposals that will benefit the further growth of Kazakhstan, and will also be accepted by the world community as a search for answers to global challenges.
The constructed housing is sold to the bank's depositors within three months, and the remainder of the unsold housing is sold to STB clients.
At the moment, we are negotiating with the public with tour associations, tour businesses, deputies, government agencies, and we hope that we will submit the draft concept to the Ministry of Justice in February, to the Government in March and in May to submit it to the Parliament so that to approve the Plan of legislative work.
Currently, the construction of two dormitories with a capacity of 200 places has begun, and two more dormitories for 250 places are at the stage of summing up the results of the competitive procedures.
We welcome these initiatives and wish the people of Kazakhstan and the President success in their implementation.
During the meeting, amendments to the Code of Business Ethics of Baiterek NMH JSC related to the formation of the Compliance Service of the Holding were also approved, and a report on the final performance of the head of the internal audit service in the III-IV quarters of 2016 was approved.
The authorized capital of the AIIB is $ 100 billion and is distributed proportionally 75/25 among regional and non-regional members.
People will be creators and will receive some kind of reward for their actions.
Since the beginning of the year, 3731 apartments have been commissioned for lending housing by the LEB, and by the end of the year another 4,764 apartments will be commissioned.
"Nurly Zhol": Disbursement of funds has increased in all directions and is proceeding according to plan
The Ministry of Energy, in accordance with the order of the Government, organized monitoring of the progress of repair work at energy enterprises and twice a month the information is sent to the Government.
We wish all the best from India and we are always ready to participate as investors, developers.
Our IT hub has joined this AIFC and through this we want to attract talents from all over the world.
Time has shown the effectiveness of the PPP institution itself and now the existing mechanisms need to be improved.
The ranking of universities is becoming an integral tool of the education system and is of great interest to the public.
141 companies are joint ventures, 41 companies are engaged in the production of goods and 37 companies export products to other countries.
At the end of 2017-2018, 51 schools will be introduced to replace emergency schools and 90 schools will eliminate three-shift education.
The company is a global contractor and carries out major industrial, infrastructure and selected commercial projects for public and private clients in Europe, the Middle East and North Africa.
The corridor will contribute to the development of transport and logistics potential and will allow Kazakhstan to integrate into world transport routes and increase the volume of transit international traffic.
We provide the necessary comfortable service and also control the provision of public services with the customer.
Kazakhstan announced the completion of a special training program for Afghan civilians and offered to continue training specialists from this country in Kazakhstani institutions.
The professor focused on the research projects of the Faculty in creating conditions for the transition of the Kazakh language to the Latin alphabet and the possibilities of scientific design for young people.
In total, 75 thousand people were involved in the implementation of projects, and the share of road-building materials of domestic production was 93%.
Lala came to Kazakhstan for the first time and she liked Astana, Borovoe, as well as hospitable people of Kazakhstan.
For the facilities of Astana Onak Uyi JSC, National Scientific Medical Center JSC and Kazmedtech JSC, independent consultants have been attracted to carry out the assessment, and assessment activities are currently being completed.
Kazakh Invest plays the role of a single negotiator representing the interests of the Government of the Republic of Kazakhstan when discussing the prospects and conditions for the implementation of investment projects.
A. Zhumagaliev told the Kyrgyz side about the Digital Kazakhstan State Program and invited them to the technical opening of the Astana Hub pavilion, which will take place on July 3, 2018.
At the end of 2017, the volume of investments in the healthcare sector amounted to 91.4 billion tenge and increased to the level of 2016 by 43.5%, which is one of the highest indicators among the sectors of the economy of Kazakhstan.
The company's products will be sold on the domestic market and will cover the demand for high-tech aluminum products.
Within the framework of the program, this year, akimats have been allocated 25 billion tenge and the construction of almost 6 thousand rental apartments has begun.
The system provides personalized accounting of more than 15 million Kazakhstanis from birth throughout life and provides automated services at all stages.
At the end of his speech, the President of Kazakhstan thanked the leadership of the region and the builders, and also congratulated all those present on the upcoming Day of the capital and wished peace, kindness and prosperity.
The project was implemented within the framework of measures to create a cluster of aluminum industries and will be the first in the history of metallurgy in Kazakhstan, when production of almost all the processing of aluminum will be concentrated on one territory.
Bakytzhan Sagintayev visited the Employment Center of the city of Kokshetau and considered measures to assist in the employment of residents of the region.
All these services are part of the Smart City project and will be located in the building of the Energy Efficiency Center.
I am grateful to you for the colossal work that you are doing in your country in Uzbekistan, and this work has a strong impact on all countries in our region.
According to the Concept, control over religious propaganda is strengthened and state functions for monitoring the activities of religious associations are expanding.
We had the opportunity to establish contacts with representatives of almost all countries of the world and our research institutes, universities used this opportunity to the fullest.
They, in turn, noted the interest of global investors in the green economy of Kazakhstan and developed recommendations to stimulate investment and services in the green sector.
To date, Kazakh Invest is working with 147 projects and is providing support to investors in terms of resolving all emerging issues.
This program selects individual treatment methods, scales access to oncological expertise and analyzes large volumes of medical literature, processing data from more than 300 medical scientific journals, 200 textbooks and almost 15 million pages of text.
During the meeting, Nursultan Nazarbayev made a number of comments and instructed the Government of the Republic of Kazakhstan to make appropriate additions to the draft program.
Today, the production branches of Altynalmas employ over 1.5 thousand people and employ about 100 units of mining equipment.
Today, 131 employers have become holders of such certificates of trust and have been excluded from the list of enterprises subject to scheduled inspections for three years.
In 2017, engineering communications were brought to more than 70 thousand plots, and all of them were allocated to private developers.
The production of original and elite seeds has been restored and other measures have been taken to support seed farms.
The company expressed interest in participating in the Consortium of the manufacturing sector together with ENU, the Cavendish Laboratory of the University of Cambridge and intends to conclude an agreement on co-financing the project on the use of heat pump technologies.
Within the framework of the Republican meeting on digitalization, a meeting with international experts was held, where the main aspects of the state program "Digital Kazakhstan".
As a result, according to the World Bank, in the Doing Business-2018 rating, Kazakhstan took 36th place and in five years has risen in this rating by 40 points.
However, funds from the sale of objects by local executive bodies go to the local budget and will be spent in accordance with the budget code for local budget expenditures.
Instructions to the responsible government agencies to prevent fuel shortages have been given and will be under constant monitoring.
In 2018, the reconstruction of the runway of the Semey airport will be completed and the reconstruction of the runway of the Kostanay airport will begin.
The program does not require targeted government funding and is implemented by attracting long-term resources in the stock market.
This will be equated with irrational use of land and will be confiscated.
The United States and Kazakhstan recognize the importance of developing agricultural trade relations and will continue to explore opportunities for enhanced cooperation, including through joint agricultural research.
The press service of the Prime Minister of the Republic of Kazakhstan officially expresses bewilderment at the dissemination of distorted information and confirms its openness to cooperation with any media in providing objective information.
The volume of highly profitable transit container traffic doubles annually and amounted to 347.5 thousand containers last year.
The results of the work will be communicated to the regions and the corresponding regulatory documents will be adopted.
The implementation of the project will allow attracting the advanced experience of world oil and gas producing companies to the country and will become an incentive for the development of all sectors of the economy of Kazakhstan.
Investment proposals comply with international standards and are already in the works.
These programs comply with international requirements and include basic social risks associated with harm to the life and health of tourists.
The winter maximum load was noted on January 28 and amounted to 14,615 MW.
BNOU provides a reliable source of fuel for countries moving to clean nuclear energy and reduces the risk of proliferation of enrichment technologies.
I am closely watching your work and I know that you have created a new capital - the city of Astana.
The highway covers over 240 settlements in 5 regions with a total population of about 5.5 million people, and is already giving its effects for the development of the economy.
Following the results of the round table, an agreement was reached to continue joint work on the development of legislative initiatives at the Kazakh Invest site and unified recommendations were developed regarding amendments to the current legislation in order to improve the investment climate.
It is in this form that this information is easy to obtain and you can also quickly obtain the necessary information, compare the level of security of cities and districts.
Such projects are effective and in demand by business.
The use of gas as a fuel is less labor intensive and more comfortable.
The agro-industrial complex will be efficient and competitive and will be exported in the future.
The results of today's visit are very productive and important, they give a new impetus to cooperation between the countries.
We are interested in further strengthening bilateral military cooperation and are ready to provide maximum support to it.
All jewelry and decorative crafts are closely related to the history of the Kazakh people and reflect the development of a national culture that has thousands of roots.
Media agency "SUCCESS K" has a high international reputation and extensive experience in holding events that create a positive image of Kazakhstan.
The new unit will double the capacity and reduce energy consumption by 24%.
Its powers are clearly regulated by conditions and signed agreements and apply only to the economic sphere.
The message covers the most important spheres of public life and is dedicated to the comprehensive and dynamic development of the state.
The territory of JSC NC "KazMunayGas" is of great strategic importance for the development of the country's economy and protects the interests of many people.
The peculiarity of the competition is that it is held in different countries and allows young musicians from all over the world to participate.
In turn, E. Idrisov thanked his colleague for this decision and called for further cooperation in this format.
During the meeting at the Ministry of Foreign Affairs of the Republic of Kazakhstan, the foreign ministers discussed a wide range of issues of bilateral, regional and multilateral cooperation and adopted a joint statement.
The American side promised to make a decision on participation in the exhibition and noted that it would open its pavilion in connection with the approval of the results of participation in EXPO-2015 in Milan.
In turn, Jamal Khan noted that Islam attaches great importance to relations with Astana, and expressed readiness to take measures to further strengthen trade and economic ties between Kazakhstan and Pakistan.
He welcomed the signing of a Memorandum of Cooperation between the Mazhilis of the Parliament of Kazakhstan and the People's Assembly of Bulgaria and expressed confidence that this document would contribute to strengthening cooperation between parliamentarians of the two countries.
The meeting on Iran's nuclear program in Almaty in 2013 further developed the negotiation process and laid the foundation for Iran's withdrawal from the sanctions regime.
Kazakhstan strongly condemns a number of terrorist attacks in Paris and states that no form of terrorism should be tolerated.
We express our deepest condolences to the French people, the families and friends of the victims, and wish the injured a speedy recovery.
Kazakhstan declares its support for the efforts of the entire international community within the framework of the UN in the fight against terrorism and extremism and believes that this evil can be overcome only by uniting the efforts of all mankind.
Thanks to this program, thousands of our young people have graduated from the best universities in the world and are now using this knowledge for their country.
According to the report, Kazakhstan is one of the countries with the highest level of human development and in 2015 ranked 56th for this indicator.
The participants of the event showed great interest in information about Kazakhstan and emphasized the content and informativeness of the reports, which were able to reveal the topic as much as possible.
Kazakhstan fully welcomes the adoption of UN Security Council resolution 2254 (2015) and supports the decisive step by the international community, including the International Support Group for Syria, towards a peaceful settlement of the bloody conflict in this country.
We are neighbors in the Caspian Sea, and the removal of restrictions in the financial sector will greatly facilitate the formation of imports of goods to Iran.
We pay special attention to the upcoming elections and intend to ensure 100% public confidence by organizing elections in accordance with high democratic standards.
The Republic of Kazakhstan supports the intensification of the search for consensus on the Nagorno-Karabakh conflict and hopes that the parties concerned will show a constructive approach to moving forward in the settlement of the conflict.